 "We now have 4-month-old mice that don't have diabetes, but that did have it before," he added.
 Professor Ehud Ur in medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, also chairman of the clinical and scientific division of the Canadian Diabetes Association, recalled that they have just begun the research.
 Like some other experts, he is skeptical about whether his diabetes can be cured, noting that these findings have no value for people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent secretary of the Nobel committee for literature at the Swedish Academy, announced on a radio program on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that the committee could not immediately reach Bob Dylan to tell him that he had won the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature and would no longer make an effort to reach him.
 Danius explained, 'We are not doing anything at the moment. I have called and emailed his closest collaborator and received friendly replies. At the moment that is enough.'
 Earlier, Jamie Siminoff, the CEO of Ring, noted that the company was founded when his doorbell from the store was not audible in his garage.
 He said he made a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said sales increased after he appeared on Shark Tank in 2013, when the show's panel of investors declined to fund the start-up.
 At the end of 2017, Siminoff was seen on the teleshopping channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with the ADT Corporation, a competing security company.
 One experimental vaccine appears to be able to reduce Ebola deaths, but no drugs have so far been clearly shown to be suitable for treating existing infections.
 An antibody cocktail, ZMapp, was initially promising in the field, but official studies showed that it had fewer benefits than desired in preventing people from dying.
 ZMapp was a control in the PALM trial, so scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatment methods to it.
 The U.S. Olympic Committee has the support of USA Gymnastics and understands that it is necessary for the Olympic family to promote a safe place for all athletes.
 We join the USOC in stating that it is in the best interest of our athletes and clubs, and their sport, to make meaningful changes to our organization rather than to take away certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can provide more clarity on how abuse on this scale, so bravely described by the victims of Larry Nassar, could go unnoticed for so long, and embraces all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC share the same goal: to ensure that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and empowering environment through the sport of gymnastics and other sports.
 During the 1960s, Brzezinski worked as an advisor to John F. Kennedy and then to the administration of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy during the 1976 campaign, and then succeeded Henry Kissinger as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981.
 As NSA, he assisted Carter in the diplomatic handling of worldwide issues, such as the Camp David Accords in 1978, the stabilization of relations between the US and China in the late 1970s, and the Iranian Revolution, the subsequent hostage crisis, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone was nominated for all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Other nominations included Best Picture, Director, Cinematography, Costume Design, Film Editing, Original Music, Production Design, Music, Sound Effects and Original Screenplay.
 The songs Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars from the film were nominated for Best Original Song. Lionsgate received 26 nominations, a record for a studio.
 In a statement from his press secretary, US President Donald Trump said Sunday night that US troops would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after a telephone conversation between Trump and Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 The Turks also said in the communiqué that they would guard the captured ISIS fighters, whom Europe did not want to take back.
 This not only proves the widely held theory that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, but also provides more details than fossils, such as color and three-dimensional placement.
 According to scientists, the plumage of this bird was brownish-black with a pale or carotenoid-colored underside.
 The find also provides insight into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 The researchers concluded that the rachis was probably a later evolutionary development, because dinosaur feathers do not have a well-developed shaft, or rachis, but do have other features of feathers - such as barbs.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but to regulate temperature or for display. The researchers suggested that this is the tail of a young dinosaur, but that this monster shows adult feathers and is not a chick.
 The researchers suggested that, despite the fact that it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the monster had the plumage of an adult and not the down of a chick.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded at the headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey. Two police officers were killed and more than twenty other people were injured.
 Among the wounded are nineteen police officers, the governor said.
 The police suspect a suspected Daesh militant (ISIS) of the attack.
 This showed that the sun follows the same basic principles as other stars: all stellar activity in the system is based solely on the brightness and rotation of the stars.
 The brightness and rotation are used to determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the number of Rossby waves, the less active the star is when it comes to magnetic reversals.
 Iwasaki got into trouble on several occasions during his journey.
 Pirates robbed him, a rabid dog attacked him in Tibet, he escaped marriage in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard is compatible with both frequencies: 2.4 Ghz and 5.0 Ghz.
 Provided the base station has dual radios, this allows backwards compatibility with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g.
 Speeds of 802.11n are substantially faster than those of predecessors with a maximum theoretical capacity of 600Mbit/s.
 Duvall is married with two children and made no impression on Miller, to whom the story was related.
 On a request for comment, Millar responded, "Mike talks a lot during the session... I was preparing myself, so I wasn't really listening to him."
 "We will make every effort to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP in 2020 by a significant margin compared with the level of 2005," Hu said.
 He has not set any figures for the cuts, saying that they will be determined on the basis of China's economic output.
 Hu urged developing countries to "avoid the old way of polluting first and cleaning up later".
 He added that 'they should not, however, be asked to take on commitments that are beyond their development, level, responsibility and capabilities.'
 The Iraqi Study Group presented its report today at 12:00 GMT.
 The warning is that no one can guarantee that any course of action in Iraq at this time will end sectarian warfare, increasing violence or the tendency toward chaos.
 The report begins with a plea for open discussion and consensus-building in the US on Middle East policy.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of current administration policy towards Iraq and urges a change of course.
 The report contains 78 recommendations, the first of which is that diplomatic action must be taken this year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile powers and to restore diplomatic relations with neighbouring countries.
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, a senator and the wife of the Argentine president, announced last night in La Plata, a city 50 km (31 miles) from Buenos Aires, that she intends to run for president.
 Mrs Kirchner announced her intention to run for the presidency at the Argentine Theatre, where she started her campaign for the Senate in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires provincial legislature.
 The debate was sparked by a discussion about investing and rebuilding after Hurricane Katrina, with some fiscal conservatives jokingly calling it "Bush's New Orleans Deal."
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort is focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to alleged insiders from Washington.
 The funeral was attended by more than four million people in Rome.
 There were so many people present that not everyone could get access to the funeral on St. Peter's Square.
 In various places in Rome were large television screens placed so that people could see the ceremony.
 Similar setups were made in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, and especially in Poland. Here, a large number of people looked at it.
 Historians have criticized earlier FBI policies for focusing their resources on easily solved cases, primarily car thefts, in order to boost the agency's success rate.
 As of fiscal year 2005, Congress funded the initiative against obscenity and declared that the FBI must deploy ten agents on adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the innings with 70 runs in just 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 In the middle order, the batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid performed well and made 100 runs together.
 But after India lost the wicket of the captain, they scored only 36 runs while losing 7 wickets to end the innings.
 President of the United States George W. Bush arrived in the morning of November 16 in Singapore for a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was received by Wong Kan Seng, the Deputy Prime Minister of Singapore, and discussed trade and terrorism issues with the Prime Minister of Singapore, Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush spoke to a crowd about increasing trade ties with Asia after losses in the midterm elections this week.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper has agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee for all parties to review, prior to second reading, following a 25-minute meeting with NDP Leader Jack Layton at PMO on Tuesday.
 During the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton asked for changes to the Conservatives' environmental law, asking for the "thorough and complete rewrite" of the Conservative Party's environmental law.
 Since the federal government took over funding of the Mersey Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the government and some federal parliamentarians have criticized the law as a stunt during the early period of the federal election to be held in November.
 Prime Minister John Howard has stated that the purpose of the legislation is to prevent the Tasmanian government from reducing the hospital's services by withdrawing an additional A$45 million.
 According to the latest bulletin, the sea level indicated a tsunami. Some clear tsunami activity has been recorded near Pago Pago and Niue.
 There was no major damage or serious injury reported in Tonga, although power was out for some time, which may have prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the PTWC tsunami warning.
 The warnings were lifted, but still, 14 schools in Hawaii were closed or near coastlines Wednesday all day.
 George W. Bush, the leader of the US, welcomed the announcement.
 A spokesman for Bush, Gordon Johndroe, described the North Korean pledge as "a major step forward in our goal of denuclearizing the Korean peninsula."
 The tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Storm Jerry, formed today over the Atlantic Ocean.
 According to the NHC (National Hurricane Center) Jerry currently poses no threat to the mainland.
 According to calculations by the U.S. Corps of Engineers, 6 inches of rain could possibly breach the earlier damaged levees.
 In the Ninth Ward, the water during Hurricane Katrina was over 20 feet high. Still, the water is up to the middle, because the nearby levee could not hold back the water.
 The water flows over a 100 foot wide stretch of the dike.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his frustrations over the deletion last month in his conversation with Wikinews.
 'He [Wales] lied to us basically from the beginning. Firstly by pretending it was a legal issue. Secondly by pretending he was listening to us, until he removed the art.'
 The community's frustrations resulted in the current efforts to establish a policy regarding the site's sexual content that hosts millions of pieces of media content under an open license.
 The completed work was primarily theoretical in nature, but the program is written for the simulation of observations of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The team was looking for the effect that would be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter of the universe and that of the Milky Way.
 Similar to how the moon exerts force on the Earth, which leads to tides, the Milky Way exerts force on the Sagittarius galaxy.
 The researchers concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, most of the dark matter in a galaxy is located in a ring around it, and consists of a large number of smaller particles.
 On television images you see white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities are giving the following warning: residents living near the plant should stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 The Japanese nuclear agency reports that radioactive cesium and iodine have been detected at the plant
 Authorities suspect that this indicates that containers with uranium fuel may have been torn and leaking.
 XDR-TB (Extremely Drug Resistant Tuberculosis) was discovered by Dr. Tony Moll in the province of KwaZulu-Natal in South Africa.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is "very, very worrying and concerning because of the very high mortality rate".
 Dr. Moll thinks that some patients have contracted the disease in the hospital, including two hospital staff.
 An infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts in a year.
 The percentage of XDR-TB among all TB patients, however, still seems low: 6000 out of 330,000 infected people in total at any one time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which both weighed more than 1,000 pounds and were traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, collided 491 miles above Earth.
 Scientists say that the collision created a huge explosion.
 They are still trying to figure out how big the impact was and how it will affect the Earth.
 The United States Strategic Command of the U.S. Department of Defense is tracking the debris.
 The result of the plot analysis is published on a public website.
 According to official sources in Ohio, a doctor from the children's hospital of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania is charged with murder with aggravating circumstances after the body of her mother was found in the trunk of her car on Wednesday.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in his T-shirt, underwear and heavily medicated state along a highway in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati.
 She sent officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue that was 500 feet away.
 At this spot they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanianaan, age 53, covered with blood-stained blankets.
 The police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease were reported this season at the end of July.
 Pigs carry the disease and transmit it to humans via mosquitoes.
 The government of India has decided to deploy people to catch pigs in the worst affected parts of the country, distribute thousands of mosquito nets and spread pesticides in response to the epidemic.
 The government has promised several million encephalitis vaccines so that health authorities can prepare for next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines this year to the places that have been hit hardest historically have been delayed because of a lack of funding and the low priority given to other diseases.
 Słania moved to Sweden in 1956, where he worked for the Swedish Postal Service for three years and became the chief engraver.
 He produced more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is recognized for its quality and detail and his name is a household name among stamp collectors. Some collectors focus solely on collecting his work.
 The beautiful stamp 'Great Deeds by Swedish Kings', made by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl in 2000 and which is mentioned in the Guinness Book of Records, was his 1,000th stamp.
 For many countries he made engravings for banknotes. Recent examples of his work are the portraits of the Prime Minister on the front of the new Canadian banknotes of 5 and 100 dollars.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to the hospital where he died shortly thereafter.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at around 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 A garage employee near the accident said: 'There were children waiting to cross the road and they were all screaming and crying.'
 They all ran back from the scene of the accident.
 Other issues on the agenda include protecting the world's remaining forests, as well as sharing technologies to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN also hopes to set up a fund to help countries that are affected by global warming to deal with its consequences.
 Flood-resistant houses, more efficient water management and crop diversification could be investments that the money could be used for.
 Fluke wrote the following: some people tried to stop women from speaking out about women's health, but these efforts failed.
 This was based on the many positive comments and support from both men and women who felt that contraception should be considered a medical necessity.
 When the fighting stopped after the wounded were transported to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining prisoners remained in the courtyard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators made an attempt to get the situation back on track, but the demands of the prisoners are unclear.
 Between 22:00-23:00 local time, the prisoners set fire to the courtyard.
 Agents dressed in riot gear soon entered the garden and drove the prisoners with tear gas.
 The fire department could give the fire master signal at 11:35.
 The seasonal flooding that would spread sediment through the river ended after the dam was built in 1963.
 This sediment was needed to create sandbars and beaches, which served as habitats for wildlife.
 The result was that two species of fish died out and two other species are threatened with extinction, including the Gila cypha.
 After the flood, the water level will only rise a few meters, but officials hope that this is enough to restore the eroded sandbanks that lie downstream.
 No tsunami warning has been issued. According to the geophysical bureau of Jakarta, that will not happen because the earthquake was not of the magnitude 6.5, which is the minimum requirement to issue a tsunami warning.
 There was no tsunami threat, but residents were still panicked and left their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey took her leave with tears in her eyes, she promised her fans she would be back.
 'I'm not saying goodbye. This is the end of one chapter and the beginning of the next.'
 The Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections have been won by the incumbent president, Hifikepunye Pohamba, with a large lead.
 Currently, the SWAPO (South West Africa People's Organization) is the ruling party, with a majority in the parliamentary elections.
 Coalition and Afghan forces went into the area to secure the location and another coalition aircraft was sent to provide support.
 The helicopter crashed high in mountainous terrain and it is suspected that this is caused by hostile fire.
 Attempts to locate the crash site are hampered by the bad weather and rough terrain.
 According to the medical charity Mangola, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization, it is the worst recorded outbreak in the country.
 Richard Veerman, spokesman for Doctors Without Borders, says: 'Angola is on the way to the worst outbreak ever and the situation in the country remains very bad.'
 It was beautiful weather when the match started at 10.00 am. In the middle of the morning it started to rain a little, but it cleared up quickly. It was a perfect day for Rugby Sevens.
 Favorite of the tournament, South Africa, started well with a comfortable win of 26 - 00 against the 5th placed Zambia.
 Although they played very stiff against their southern sisters, South Africa managed to improve themselves in the tournament.
 They stood out for their tight defence, control of the ball and excellent teamwork and were clearly the main opponent.
 Amsterdam officials and staff of the Anne Frank House say the tree has a fungus and is a danger to public health, because the tree would fall, according to them.
 The tree was to be cut down on Tuesday, but an emergency order from the court prevented this.
 The entrances to the cave were called 'The Seven Sisters' and all have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images show that the temperature at night and during the day differs and show that it is probably caves.
 During the day they are cooler than the surrounding surface and at night they are warmer.
 'The thermal behavior of these is not as stable as that of large caves on Earth that often have a temperature that is quite constant,' said Glen Cushing of the United States Geological Survey (USGS) Astrogeology Team and Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, voting has traditionally required little technology: voters go to a booth and put a pre-printed piece of paper in an envelope marked with the candidate they are voting for.
 Officials first check the identity of the voter. Then the voter slides the envelope into the ballot box and then he puts his signature on the voting roll.
 The process is relatively tightly defined in the electoral law of France.
 Voting booths have been required to be transparent since 1988, so that both voters and observers can see that no envelopes are present at the start of the voting and that no envelopes are added other than those of registered and authorized voters.
 The candidates can send representatives to witness every part of the process. Volunteers count the votes at night under strict supervision and according to specific procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, which was launched worldwide earlier due to cost savings and various functionalities, was extensively discussed in the Taipei IT Month of 2007.
 The consumer market for laptop computers is however very diverse and changed, after ASUS in 2007 was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award by the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The station's website describes the show as 'old school radio drama with a new and unheard twist'!
 In the beginning, the show was only broadcast via the long-running radio website TogiNet Radio, a website about talk shows on the radio.
 At the end of 2015, the AstroNet Radio substation was established.
 The series originally featured local amateur voice actors from the eastern Texas area.
 The widespread looting reportedly took place at night, because there were no law enforcement officers on the streets of Bishkek.
 Bishkek was described by one person as an "anarchist state", where gangs roamed the streets and shops were looted for consumer goods.
 In Bishkek, the blame for the unrest was placed by several people with demonstrators from the south.
 In the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in South Africa's Rustenburg, that same country eliminated the New Zealand All Blacks in a match of the Tri Nations rugby union.
 The final score was a one-point win, 21–20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 The Springboks finally won, after losing five games in a row.
 It was the last match for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks ago.
 The final match of the series is next week in Ellis Park in Johannesburg, when the Springboks play Australia.
 Monday at 10:08 am the west of Montana was shaken by a moderate earthquake.
 The United States Geological Survey (USGS) and the National Earthquake Information Center received no reports of damage.
 The earthquake occurred about 20 km (15 mi) northeast of Dillon, and about 65 km (40 mi) south of Butte.
 A dead wild duck has been found in a marshland near Lyon in eastern France, which has been confirmed to be infected with the deadly H5N1 strain of bird flu.
 After Italy, Greece, Bulgaria, Slovenia, Slovenia, Germany and Austria, France is the seventh country in the European Union where this virus is found.
 Suspected H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers accused God of 'the widespread killing, destruction and terrorizing of many millions of earthly inhabitants'.
 Agnost Chambers says his lawsuit is 'frivolous' and that 'anyone can sue anyone.'
 The French opera is a story by Camille Saint-Saens and is about an artist 'whose life is determined by the love of drugs and Japan.'
 As a result, the performers smoke cannabis on stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to join in.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann finished in fourth, fifth and sixth place, respectively.
 When the results were announced, Gingrich praised Santorum, but criticized Romney, on whose behalf negative campaign ads against Gingrich had been published in Iowa.
 Perry stated that he would "return to Texas to assess the results of tonight's vote, to determine whether there is any chance for me in this election," but later said that he would finish the campaign and would participate in the January 21 primary in South Carolina.
 The winner of the Ames Straw Poll in August, Bachmann, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was then transferred to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he died.
 According to sources, he was in his twenties. "I was not present or directly involved in this unfortunate incident, but I keep the family of the victim in my thoughts," said a statement from Bieber.
 The entertainment news website TMZ says the photographer had parked his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and was trying to take pictures of the traffic stop before he crossed the street and took more pictures, which led to the California Highway Patrol officer overseeing the traffic stop telling him twice to return to his car.
 The driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will probably not be prosecuted, according to the police.
 Only eighteen medals are awarded each day, so many countries missed out on the podium.
 Among them are the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen was ninth in the standing class for women in the Super-G, and Finland, where Katja Saarinen was tenth in the same event.
 Australian Mitchell Gourley finished 11th in the men's standing Super-G. His Czech opponent Oldrich Jelinek was 16th in the sitting Super-G.
 Arly Velasquez of Mexico finished 15th in the men's Super-G (sitting). New Zealand's Adam Hall finished ninth in the Super-G (standing).
 The blind skier Maciej Krezel of the Polish men's team and his guide Anna Ogarzynska were thirteenth in the Super G. The South Korean Jong Seork Park was twenty-fourth in the sitting Super-G for men.
 The UN peacekeeping force, which came to Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, is being blamed for the spread of the disease that broke out at the troops' camp.
 The trial revealed that the waste from the UN camp was poorly treated, allowing bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Haiti had not had cholera since 1800, until the troops arrived.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti spoke of independent students who said that the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion had brought the disease with them to Haiti without knowing it.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, the outbreak is probably caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient was admitted to the Howard University Hospital and is in stable condition.
 The patient had been to Nigeria, where the Ebola virus was already present in small numbers.
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, including isolating the patient to prevent others from becoming infected.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon worked in various positions on a number of series.
 He cooperated in the 80s with shows like Taxi, Cheers and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he worked with Brooks and Groening on The Simpsons and was responsible for recruiting the first writing team.
 After his departure from the series in 1993, he remained on paper executive producer, which earned him royalties for each series, worth several tens of millions of dollars.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 Later reports also indicate that a bomb threat was made on the plane, which forced it to return to Afghanistan and land in Kandahar.
 Initial reports indicate that the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after it was not allowed to make an emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Airplane crashes are common in Iran. They have an aging fleet for both civilian and military operations that is poorly maintained.
 International sanctions mean that no new aircraft can be purchased.
 Earlier this week, an accident with a police helicopter killed three people and injured three more.
 Last month, Iran experienced its worst airplane crash in years when a plane en route to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 In the same month, a passenger plane crashed off the runway at Mashhad, killing 17 people.
 Aerosmith has canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The tour of the rock band would travel through the US and Canada until September 16.
 They canceled the tour after singer Steven Tyler was injured when he fell off the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tiebreak, after both men failed to concede a single point on serve throughout the set.
 Del Potro had an early lead in the second set, but here too followed a tiebreak after it became 6-6.
 Potro was treated on his shoulder at the time, but managed to continue the race.
 The local start time of the program was 20.30 hours (15.00 UTC).
 Famous singers from all over the country sang bhajans or religious songs at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The evening started with the singer Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. Lakka Singh also presented the Chhappan bhog bhajan, with the help of the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Then Lakkha Singh sang the bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was served 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (in Hinduism, these are 56 different edible items, such as sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc. offered to the holy figure).
 Lakkha Singh also presented the Chhappan bhog bhajan. The singer Raju Khandelwal helped him with this.
 Thursday, Satoru Iwata, the director of Nintendo, revealed during the keynote presentation of the Tokyo Game Show the design of the controller for the new Nintendo Revolution.
 Just like a TV remote control, the controller uses two sensors near the TV to determine its position in three-dimensional space.
 This allows players to control actions and movements in video games by moving the device through the air.
 Shortly after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and was out of the race.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso led most of the race, but lost the lead immediately after his pit stop, probably because of a badly placed front right wheel.
 Michael Schumacher did not finish his race long after Alonso due to the damage to the suspension caused by the many duels during the race.
 In a transcript of the news conference, he said she was "a cute little girl with a nice voice."
 I was moved every time we rehearsed this, from the bottom of my heart.
 On an internal camera, it was seen for about 3 minutes after launch that many pieces of insulation foam detached from the fuel tank.
 However, these are believed to have caused no damage to the shuttle.
 The director of NASA's Shuttle Program, N. Wayne Hale Jr. said the foam fell "after the period we were concerned about."
 After five minutes the wind starts, and a minute later the wind is already at 70 km/h... then it starts to rain, but so hard and so much that it feels like needles on your skin. Then hail falls. People panic, start screaming and run over each other.
 'I lost my sister and her boyfriend. When I tried to get to them, people were jumping over wheelchair users and pushing them away,' said Armand Versace.
 In addition, NHK reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating as normal.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reports that the earthquake has caused no problems and that in the nuclear power plant of Shika reactors 1 and 2 have been stopped.
 According to reports, 9,400 households in the region are without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads have been damaged, the railway service has been suspended in the affected areas and the prefecture of the airport Noto in Ishikawa remains closed for a longer period.
 One bomb exploded outside the office where the governor-general works.
 Within a period of two hours, three more bombs exploded near government buildings.
 Some reports put the official death toll at eight, but official reports confirm a maximum of 30 wounded, but the final numbers are not yet in.
 In urine samples from pets that died after eating contaminated pet food, both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 Researchers at the university found that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block kidney function.
 Scientists found out that crystals are formed in cat urine when you add melanin and cyanuric acid to it.
 The composition of these crystals has similarities with that of the urine of the affected pets, compared with infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).
 I don't know if you realize this, but most goods from Central America entered this country without having to pay any taxes.
 And yet, eighty percent of our goods were taxed using tariffs from countries in Central America.
 I thought that was very unfair; it was undoubtedly unfair.
 What I mean to say is that you treat us as we treat you.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, has signed a bill that makes it illegal to sell or rent violent video games to minors.
 Under this law, violent video games sold in the state of California must have an '18' sticker. Selling to a minor is punishable by a fine of $1000 per offense.
 Kier Starmer QC, Director of Public Prosecutions, said this morning that he intends to prosecute both Pryce and Huhne.
 Huhne has resigned. In the cabinet is MP Ed Davey his replacement, while MP Norman Lamb is expected to take over Davey's duties as Minister of Trade.
 Huhne and Pryce are expected to appear before Westminster Magistrates Court on February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver of the vehicle.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and jaw, and Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo a reconstructive facial surgery.
 Uka's weapon failed as he was aiming it at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has chronic pain, is blind in one eye, has a piece of skull missing and his face has been reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider gave his statement via video link from a USAF base in the country from which he originated.
 In addition to the event of Wednesday, Carpanedo also participated in two individual races of the championship.
 Her first was the Slalom, where she got a Did Not Finish on her first run. 36 of the 116 competitors got the same result in that race.
 In the other race she participated in, the standing Giant Slalom, she was tenth of the ladies, with a combined time of 4:41:30. That is 2:11:60 minutes slower than the Austrian winner Claudia Loesch, and 1:09:02 minutes slower than the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished ninth.
 Four skiers in the women's sitting slalom were unable to finish their runs and 45 of the 117 skiers in the giant slalom failed to qualify for the race.
 The stolen laptop and mobile phone have been recovered by the Madhya Pradesh police.
 According to assistant inspector general D. K. Arya, five of the rapists of the Swedish woman have been arrested and they have found her mobile phone and laptop.
 Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar are the suspects.
 According to police commissioner Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the suspects had covered their faces when they appeared in court.
 There were three people in the house when the car hit the house, but none of them were injured.
 The driver, however, suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while the emergency services tried to free the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially admitted to Great Yarmouth, at the James Paget Hospital.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has since been convicted in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court for the murder of her son.
 She is in custody pending charges and trial, but the eyewitness account may have been coerced because her story has been published many times.
 This is common practice in the rest of the UK, but justice in Scotland works differently and courts have deemed the publication of photos as possibly detrimental.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee notes that 'journalists are playing a dangerous game when they publish pictures of suspects.'
 Crown Office has overall control of prosecutions and has told journalists that no further statements will be made, at least until charges are laid.
 According to sources, the document refers to a settlement, something that the Palestinians have long wanted on the basis of the borders before the war in the Middle East in 1967.
 Other topics discussed were the future status of Jerusalem, a city holy to both peoples, and the problems in the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands that a permanent military presence be maintained in the valley for ten years after the signing of an agreement, but the PA is only willing to accept a presence for five years.
 Shooters in the supplementary test for pest control had to be closely monitored by foresters, as the test was followed and its effectiveness was assessed.
 In a partnership between the NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc, qualified volunteers were recruited for the Sporting Shooters Association's hunting program.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of park conservation and heritage at the NPWS, the four chosen shooters for the first shooting operation have had an extensive safety and training instruction.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a nine-member provisional electoral council (Provisional Electoral Council of CEP).
 With this, Martelly has in the past four years, five times a CEP achieved.
 Last month, the presidential commission recommended the dismissal of the previous National Electoral Council as part of a package of measures to hold new elections in the country.
 The commission was set up by Martelly in response to widespread protests against the government that have taken place since October.
 The sometimes violent protests were sparked by the failure to hold elections, some of which were due to take place as early as 2011.
 There have been about 60 reported cases of defective iPods overheating, resulting in six fires and four people with minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of the 27 accidents involving the devices.
 Last week, METI announced that Apple had reported 34 additional incidents of overheating that the company called "not serious."
 'Very regrettable', was the reaction of the ministry about the fact that Apple has postponed the report.
 Mariana was hit by the earthquake at 07.19 local time (Friday 21.19 GMT).
 The Northern Mariana Islands Emergency Management Office said no damage has been reported across the territory.
 In addition, the National Tsunami Warning Center reported that there was no tsunami warning.
 In Manila, the Philippine capital, a former policeman from the Philippines has taken tourists from Hong Kong hostage by hijacking their bus.
 With his M16 rifle, Rolando Mendoza shot the tourists.
 Several hostages have been freed and at least six fatalities have been confirmed.
 Six hostages were released earlier, including the children and elderly, and the Filipino photographers.
 Later, the photographers returned in exchange for an older woman who needed to go to the toilet. Mendoza was eventually shot.
 Liggins went into medicine, following in his father's footsteps.
 Trained as a midwife, he started working in 1959 at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland.
 While working in the hospital, Liggins did research on premature birth in his spare time.
 His research showed that the maturation of the fetal lungs of babies was accelerated by the administration of a hormone.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators found two "black boxes" with flight recorders on Wednesday.
 Even fellow wrestlers paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said, 'Luna was the first 'Queen of Extreme'. My first manager. Luna passed away on the night of two moons. As unique as she was. A strong woman.'
 Dustin 'Goldust' Runnels said that 'Luna was as weird as I am... maybe even weirder... I love her and will miss her... hopefully she's in a better place'.
 Of the 1,400 people surveyed for the 2010 federal election, the number of people opposed to Australia becoming a republic increased by 8 per cent since 2008.
 Outgoing Prime Minister Julia Gillard said during the campaign for the 2010 federal election that Australia should become a republic after the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 34 percent of the participants in this poll supported this position. They want Queen Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 Twenty-nine percent of respondents said Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, and at the other end of the scale, 31 percent said it should never happen.
 The Olympic gold medalist swam the 100 and 200 freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games, but his condition was questioned because of his complaints.
 He could not take the medication he needed to ease his pain because it is banned at the Games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number on January 25.
 Several people verified the discovery in early February using different hardware and software and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets could have been a source of water on Earth, along with organic material that forms proteins and supports life.
 Scientists hope to gain insight into the way planets are formed, especially the Earth, since it has been a long time since comets collided with the Earth.
 Cuomo (53) was inaugurated as governor earlier this year and signed a law last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors "political nonsense and gossip."
 He is speculated to run for the presidency in 2016.
 The FAA says NextGen would allow planes to take shorter routes, saving millions of tons of fuel and reducing carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite-based technology, unlike older technologies using ground-based radars, which allows air traffic controllers to locate aircraft much more accurately, and to provide pilots with clearer information.
 No additional transport is provided and no surface trains stop at Wembley; in addition, the car parks and the P&R are not accessible on the site.
 A possible lack of transportation increased the chances that the match would be played behind closed doors and without supporters.
 A study published Tuesday in the journal Science looked at the formation of a new bird species on the Galapagos Islands in Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden, reported that new species evolved within two generations. It was thought that this process took much longer because the cross-breeding of a native Darwin finch, the Medium ground finch, with an immigrant Cactus ground finch, the Española ground finch, took longer.
 Gold can be worked into many shapes. It can be rolled into small shapes.
 It can be drawn into a narrow wire that can be twisted and braided. It can also be forged or rolled into plates.
 Once it has been made very thin, it can be pasted onto another metal. It can even be made so thin that it was sometimes used for the decoration of hand-painted illustrations in books which were called 'illuminated manuscripts'.
 This is called the pH value of a chemical. You can make an indicator using red cabbage juice.
 Then the color of the cabbage juice changes based on the acidity (acid to basic or alkaline) of the chemical.
 Based on the amount of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) in the chemical being tested, the pH value is indicated.
 Hydrogen atoms consist of one proton and one electron, and hydrogen ions are protons without electrons.
 Mix both dry powders together, wet your hands and clean and make a ball.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels strange and forms a kind of shell.
 In the cities of Harappa and Mohenjodaro, almost every house had a flushing toilet connected to an advanced sewage system.
 Sewage remains have been found in houses in Minoan cities on the Greek islands of Crete and Santorini.
 There were also toilets in China, Egypt and Persia in ancient times. Toilets in the Roman era were often part of a public bathhouse, where both men and women gathered in a mixed group.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you are using a satellite.
 As soon as the spacecraft receives the call, it immediately sends it back.
 The satellite is shot into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere distorts some of our light and images.
 To launch a satellite or telescope into space, you need a huge rocket that is more than 30 meters long.
 The wheel has changed the world incredibly. The most important thing that the wheel has given us is an easier and faster transport.
 The train, the car and many other means of transport are the result of this.
 There are medium-sized cats that eat medium-sized prey, from hares to antelopes and deer.
 In addition, there are many small cats (such as stray cats kept as pets) that hunt in larger numbers small prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 Their success comes from the idea of a niche, a special job that each cat has so that they do not compete with others.
 Lions are the most social cats and live in large groups called prides.
 Troops consist of one to three adult males who are related to each other and also have up to thirty females and pups.
 The women are normally closely related to each other and form a large family of sisters and daughters.
 A pride of lions behaves much like a pack of wolves or dogs, animals that look surprisingly like lions (but not other big cats) and are very deadly to their prey.
 The tiger is a versatile athlete and can climb (although not well), swim, jump long distances and has five times the pulling power of a strong person.
 The tiger belongs to the same group (Genus Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars. These four felines are the only ones that can roar.
 A tiger does not roar with full force like a lion. It is more like he is growling a whole sentence.
 Ocelots' favorite meal is small animals. They catch monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds if they can. Ocelots hunt almost exclusively on animals that are much smaller than they are.
 Scholars suspect that ocelots use their sense of smell to hunt small animals (their prey), by smelling the ground where they have been.
 They can see very well in the dark and move very quietly. Ocelots hunt by blending in with their surroundings and then pouncing on their prey.
 When a small group of organisms (a small population) breaks away from the large population from which they originated (for example, by moving over a mountain range or river, or by being moved to another island from which they cannot easily return), they often find themselves in a different environment than before.
 In this new environment, other raw materials and other enemies appear, so the new population must change its behavior or adapt to be able to compete.
 Because they still need the same adaptations as before, the original population has not changed at all.
 As the new population began to adapt to the new environment, they also began to look less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will be so different in appearance that you can no longer call them the same species.
 This process is called speciation and simply means the formation of new species. Speciation is an unavoidable consequence and a very important part of evolution.
 Plants produce oxygen that people breathe and they take up carbon dioxide that people exhale.
 Through photosynthesis, plants get their nutrients from the sun and also provide shade.
 Our houses and clothes are made of plants. We eat mostly plants. Without plants, animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was at the top of the food chain at that time. It had nothing to fear, except from other Mosasauruses.
 His long jaws had more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus an extra set in the palate, which means that nothing or no one could escape him.
 It is not certain, but it is possible that his tongue was forked. It ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs and perhaps even its own kind.
 In water areas were also nothing safe for the attacks; also huge dinosaurs like the Tyrannosaurus Rex were no match for him.
 Although most of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans also had their share of strange or unusual delicacies, including wild boar, peacocks, snails and a kind of rodent called a dormouse.
 In addition, there was a difference; poor people and women sat on chairs during the meal, but rich men liked to hold a banquet together where they lay on their side while eating.
 Meals from the Roman era do not contain food that came from America or Asia to Europe in later centuries.
 They did not have maize, tomatoes, potatoes, cocoa. Moreover, no ancient Roman ever ate a turkey.
 The Babylonians made a primary temple for all their gods. This temple was seen as the god's own house.
 People made offerings to the gods and the priests tried to satisfy the needs of the gods by organizing ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had a public courtyard and a back room that was only accessible to priests.
 Sometimes as part of the temples were built towers in the form of pyramids, called ziggoeratten.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 Houses were not of great importance in the warm climate of the Middle East.
 The daily life of the Hebrew family took place mostly outdoors.
 Women cooked in the garden; shops were no more than a counter along the street. Stone was used to build houses.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, and so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland had few inhabitants. According to Norse sagas, Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder, found Greenland on his way west, and gave it its name.
 He made this discovery, but there were already Eskimo tribes living there at that time.
 Although all were 'Scandinavian' countries, the people, the royal family, customs and history of Sweden, Iceland, Denmark and Norway were very different.
 After watching the movie National Treasure, you might think that there is a treasure map on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 That is a misconception, however. There is something written on the back, but it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the American Declaration of Independence are the words 'Original Declaration of Independence, July 4, 1776'. The text is upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is certain that the large parchment (29¾ inches by 24½ inches) was once rolled up for storage.
 It seems that the designation was simply added as a kind of label.
 Thanks to the D-Day landings and the fighting that followed, northern France was liberated. The south, however, remained occupied.
 It was ruled by Vichy France, which was a group of French people who sided with the Germans in 1940 and thus collaborated with the enemy instead of fighting against them.
 On 15 August 1940, the Allies invaded southern France in Operation Dragoon.
 The Americans and the Free French had liberated southern France in just two weeks, and then they headed for Germany.
 A civilization is a single culture shared by a large group of people who live and work together in a society.
 From the Latin civilis, which means civilian, comes the term civilization, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city-state; and that also defines in a certain way the format of society.
 City-states are the precursors of nations. A civilization with a culture suggests that knowledge is passed down over multiple generations, a lasting cultural footprint and balanced distribution.
 When minority cultures disappear, they often leave no relevant historical evidence behind, and so they are not officially recognized as civilizations.
 During the revolution, thirteen states under the Articles of Confederation formed a weak central government, consisting only of a Congress.
 The Congress lacked the power to levy taxes, because there was no national executive or judicial authority, and to enforce all decisions on state authorities, which often did not want to cooperate.
 Nor did it have the power to ignore tax laws and tariffs between states.
 First, all states had to unanimously agree to the articles before they could be amended, but the states did not take the national government so seriously that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is the second most successful team in the world, after Germany, and won the 2006 FIFA World Cup.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and F1 motor racing.
 Winter sports are especially popular in the northern regions, where Italians participate in international competitions and Olympic events.
 Japan consists of almost 7,000 islands (with Honshu as the largest island). This makes Japan the 7th largest island in the world.
 Because of the cluster/group of islands that Japan possesses, Japan is geographically often referred to as a 'peninsula'.
 The history of Taiwan begins in the 15th century, when sailors from Europe sailed past the island and gave it the name Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company (VOC) established a base in southwestern Taiwan, where the VOC took over the indigenous grain production processes and employed Chinese workers on rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan were conquered by troops of the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912), after which Taiwan was incorporated as a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 After the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki in 1895, which transferred sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Built up of three large constructions, the Machu Picchu consists of Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Room of Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edges of the complex have been rebuilt so that tourists can get a better idea of how they looked before.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu was restored. The renovation is still ongoing.
 For example, worldwide the most common photo format for still images is 35 mm, which was the usual film format in the late analogue film era.
 These are still produced today, although it is mainly the ratio of the image that the image sensor of the digital camera has taken over.
 Oddly enough, 35 mm film is actually 36 mm wide, with a height of 24 mm.
 The aspect ratio of this size (divide by twelve to get the simplest ratio of whole numbers) would be 3:2.
 Many common formats (e.g. APS-like formats) are equal to or a close approximation of this aspect ratio.
 The rule of thirds, which is often abused and ridiculed by many, is a simple guideline that makes the image dynamic, yet also clear.
 The most effective place for the main subject is at the intersection of the lines. This divides the image vertically and horizontally into three parts (see example).
 In this period in the history of Europe, the rich and powerful Catholic Church was under fire.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity has united European states, despite differences in language and customs.
 From the king to the commoner, his all-pervasive power affected everyone.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to combat suffering and poverty, and the church has the means to do so.
 The church had been the central authority in Rome for over a thousand years, and this relationship of power and money led many people to question whether this principle was being upheld.
 Great Britain imposed a blockade on the sea, aimed at Germany, shortly after the outbreak of hostilities.
 The strategy proved effective, as it was no longer possible to deliver vital supplies to the military and civilians, but it violated the generally accepted international law that has been established over the past two centuries in various international agreements.
 Britain laid mines in international waters, so that ships could no longer sail in large parts of the ocean, which was dangerous even for neutral ships.
 Due to the limited response to this tactic, Germany expected a similar response to the unrestricted submarine warfare of the country.
 During the 1920s, most citizens and nations had a pacifist and isolationist attitude.
 After the First World War, states wanted to prevent such horrors from ever happening again.
 Tesla emigrated to the United States in 1884 to work for the Edison Company in New York City.
 When he came to the United States, he had only 4 cents, a collection of poems and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor (his former boss) for Thomas Edison.
 Ancient China had a unique way of representing different time periods; each phase of China or each ruling family had a distinctive dynasty.
 Also between the different dynasties there was an unstable period in which the provinces were divided. The most famous was the period of the Three Kingdoms, which took place in the 60 years between the Han and the Jin dynasty.
 At that time, there were heavy wars between different nobles who fought for the throne.
 In the history of ancient China, the Three Kingdoms period is one of the bloodiest. Thousands of people died in the struggle for the highest place in the great palace in Xi'an.
 The Revolution had major social and political consequences, such as the use of the metric system, a shift from absolute monarchy to republicanism, nationalism and the idea that the land belongs to its inhabitants rather than a single leader.
 For all male applicants, positions were available after the revolution, so that the most ambitious and suitable candidates could succeed.
 The same applies to the army. The army ranks are no longer based on a person's class but on the caliber of the person.
 The French Revolution inspired the oppressed working class in other countries to revolt.
 Muhammad was intensely concerned with supernatural matters. He often went to a cave for meditation, which later became known as the Cave of Hira in the Mountains of Noer.
 The cave itself, which has withstood the ravages of time, gives a very vivid picture of the spirituality of Muhammad.
 The cave is located on one of the mountain peaks on the north side of Mecca and is completely closed off from the rest of the world.
 Even if it was known that the cave existed, it was not easy to find. Once inside the cave, there is total isolation.
 All you can see is the clear, beautiful sky and the many surrounding mountains. From the cave, there is very little of this world to see or hear.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the Ancient World still standing.
 The Great Pyramid was built by the Egyptians in the third century BC and is one of the many large pyramid structures built in honour of a deceased pharaoh.
 The Giza Plateau or 'Pyramids of Giza' in the Egyptian valley of the dead contains several pyramids (of which the Great Pyramid is the largest), several small tombs, a number of temples and the great sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Khufu. Many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built as tributes to Khufu's wives and family members.
 The up-bow sign looks like a V and the down-bow sign looks like a dot or a square with the bottom missing.
 Above means you should start at the tip and push the bow away. Below means you should start at the bowknot (the place where your hand holds the bow) and pull the bow.
 An upward movement usually produces a softer sound, while a downward movement produces a stronger and more assertive sound.
 Take the freedom to sketch your personal signs, but do not forget that the printed staff signs are there for a musical reason, so they should usually be respected.
 A group of market women sat on October 6, 1789 behind the departure of the terrified Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette and their two young children (Marie Therese of 11 and Louis-Charles of 4), and the king's sister, Madame Elizabeth, from Versailles to Paris.
 They rode back to the French capital in a carriage, surrounded by jeering and threatening mobs that threatened the royal couple.
 The actions of the crowd forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 At one point, someone in the crowd held up the head of a royal guard who had been murdered at Versailles in front of the eyes of a terrified queen.
 The war costs of U.S. imperialism in the conquest of the Philippines have been paid by the Filipino people.
 They were imposed on the American colonial regime to pay taxes to finance a large part of the costs and the interest on bonds was issued through the banks on Wall Street in the name of the Philippine government.
 American imperialism rested in large part on the enormous profits of the long exploitation of the Philippines.
 To understand the Templars, one must know the context that gave rise to the order.
 The period in which this happened is commonly referred to as the High Middle Ages, the European history of the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000-1300 AD).
 After the early Middle Ages came the High Middle Ages. These were followed by the Late Middle Ages, which usually end around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term for a wide assortment of ideas in practice: from technological supply or technological compulsion to a strict sense that human fate is driven by an underlying logic that is linked to scientific laws and the appearance of them in technology.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism have these two general views: the development of technology follows a trajectory that for the most part extends beyond cultural or political influence, and that technology in turn has 'effects' on societies that are inherent rather than socially conditioned.
 For example, some will say that the arrival of the car automatically leads to the construction of roads.
 A national road network is economically unfeasible for only a few cars, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 The massive car ownership also causes more accidents on the road and this leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health care to be able to repair the human body.
 In Romanticism, a large part of cultural determinism was included, which came from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In Romanticism, geography formed the individual and over time, customs and cultures emerged from this geography, which formed a harmonious society and were better than the arbitrary imposed laws.
 Constantinople was the fashion capital of feudal Europe, as Paris is today.
 It was known from about 400 AD to about 1100 AD as an epicenter of luxury.
 The status of the empire declined in the 12th century, mainly because the crusaders returned with silk and spices that were more valuable than what the Byzantine markets could offer.
 Around this time, Paris also took over the title of fashion capital from Constantinople.
 Gothic architecture flourished in the 10th, 11th and 14th centuries.
 Clothing was strongly influenced by Byzantine culture from the east.
 Due to the slow communication channels, however, styles in the west were 25 to 30 years behind.
 At the end of the Middle Ages, a style of its own began to develop in Western Europe. One of the greatest developments was the result of the Crusades: people began to use buttons to fasten their clothing.
 Self-sufficient agriculture is agriculture where enough food is produced to meet the needs of the farmer and his family.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple system that is usually organic, using saved seed from the ecoregion, combined with rotating crops or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yield.
 In the past, most farmers worked in subsistence agriculture. In many developing countries, this is still the case.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded people who feel neglected by societal norms, giving them the opportunity to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished by the age, ethnicity, social class, location and/or gender of their members.
 A subculture can be defined by the following types of qualities: linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographical, or a combination of these factors.
 Members of a subculture often show which group they belong to by a certain symbolic style in what they wear, in how they behave and the jargon they speak.
 One of the most commonly used methods of illustrating the importance of socialization was the few unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune or deliberate abuse, were not socialized by adults during their upbringing.
 They are called 'wolf children' or 'wild children'. Some wolf children have been locked up by people (usually their own parents); sometimes this child was abandoned, because the parents did not want to accept the serious mental or physical disability of the child.
 Troubled children may have experienced severe child abuse or a serious trauma before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Others are said to have been raised by animals, and some are said to have lived in the wilderness alone.
 A feral child who has not been raised by humans may exhibit behavior that resembles the behavior of the animal it has been raised by (within physical limits), such as fear of or indifference to humans.
 Learning on a project basis should simplify education and make it more interesting, but scaffolding goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method but a tool to support individuals who are facing a new learning experience, for example a new computer program or a new project.
 Support can be both virtual and real. A teacher is a form of support, but the paperclip of Microsoft Office is too.
 There is virtual scaffolding built into the software that asks questions, provides memory aids and explains procedures that may be difficult to understand without help for students.
 There are several reasons that children end up in foster care, such as neglect, abuse and exploitation.
 No child should grow up in an environment where they are not well cared for, where they are not loved and where they cannot develop, but this happens.
 We consider the foster care system to be a safe zone for these children.
 The foster care system is supposed to provide a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education, and reliable health care.
 In foster care, all needs that were neglected in the previous home must be met.
 The internet is merging the elements of interpersonal and mass communication.
 The different characters of the internet lead to new dimensions in the application of the Uses & Gratifications-theory.
 'Learning' and 'socialisation' are, for example, suggested as important reasons for using the Internet (James et al., 1995).
 Eighmey and McCord (1998) introduced new motivation aspects such as 'personal involvement' and 'continuing relationships' when they investigated audience reactions to websites.
 That video recordings are used, led to remarkable findings in the interpretation of micro-expressions, that are facial movements that last a few milliseconds.
 It is claimed that no one can recognize a lie by only looking at micro-expressions.
 Oliver Sacks described in his essay The President's Speech how people who cannot understand speech due to brain damage can nevertheless accurately judge its sincerity.
 He even suggested that other species, such as domestic dogs, also have the ability to interpret human behavior.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two groups of genetic variants: hidden and visible.
 Mutation adds new genetic variation; selection eliminates this variation from the pool of expressed variation.
 For each generation, there is variation between the two groups by means of separation and recombination.
 A primate with a digestive system similar to that of humans can survive in the savannah, but it is difficult to obtain the necessary amino acids from the plant sources available there.
 Failure to comply can have serious consequences: stunted growth, malnutrition and eventually death.
 The easiest plant sources to find are the proteins in leaves and legumes, but unless they are cooked, they are difficult for primates like us to digest.
 Not only is animal food (ants, termites, eggs) easily digestible, but it also contains a lot of proteins that contain all the essential amino acids.
 All in all, we should not be surprised if our ancestors solved their 'protein problem' in the same way as chimpanzees on the savannah solve this problem today.
 Sleep disruption is when you wake up for a reason during your normal sleep period and fall back to sleep within a short time (10–60 minutes).
 This is quite easy by using a relatively soft alarm clock that brings you back to your consciousness without waking you up completely.
 If you set your clock in your sleep, you can place it on the other side of the room. This way you have to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other options based on the biorhythm are, for example, drinking a lot of liquid before going to sleep (and then especially water or tea, a well-known diuretic). This means that you will have to get up to go to the bathroom.
 The amount of inner calm a person has is in contrast to the amount of stress that a person carries in his or her body and mind.
 The less stress, the more positive the life force. Every human being is able to achieve contentment and total peace.
 Everyone can enlighten his or her mind. Only your own stress and negativity stand in the way of this goal.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been enriched with the Mahayana path of love and with a large number of techniques from Indian yoga.
 Tibetan Buddhism consists of a relatively simple core of kundalini yoga, meditation, and a following of universal love.
 Through yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualized images, the energy of Kundalini yoga (enlightenment energy) is awakened.
 The core of Tibetan meditation is yoga with a deity as a focus. With the help of the visualization of various deities, energy channels are cleared, chakras are activated and the consciousness is brought into an enlightened state.
 Because Germany was a common enemy in World War II, a cooperation between the USSR and the USA was established. When the war ended, the conflicts between system, process and culture caused the countries to quarrel with each other.
 The former allies stood two years after the end of the war opposite each other, this was the beginning of the Cold War.
 The war would last 40 years and proxy armies fought on battlefields in Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba and many other places.
 The Polish defensive forces held out until 17 September 1939, when they had to retreat and reorganize along the bridgehead in Romania.
 These plans were however overtaken in one night, when 800,000 soldiers from the Red Army of the Soviet Union invaded the Latvian and Ukrainian fronts, after they occupied the eastern parts of Poland, in violation of the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish non-aggression pact and other international peace treaties, both bilateral and multilateral.
 Shipping is the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the ocean.
 Traditionally, it is the job of the navy to ensure that a country retains the ability to transport people and goods, while the ability of the enemy to transport people and goods is impeded.
 The US tried to get men and materiel across the Atlantic to the British and this North Atlantic campaign of WWII is one of the most remarkable recent examples.
 The German Navy tried to stop this traffic at the same time with the help of mainly U-boats.
 Like the rest of Europe, Britain would probably have fallen into German hands if the Allies had failed.
 It is believed that the goats were first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 In ancient times, cultures and tribes began to keep them so that they could always easily get their hair, meat, milk and skins.
 Domesticated goats were usually kept in herds on a hill or other grazing area, guarded by a goatherd, often a child or young person. This is still the case today.
 In the 16th century, horse-drawn railways were built in England.
 Although horse-drawn railways consisted of only a rail of planks, the horses had to run faster and pull larger amounts than on the somewhat difficult roads of that time.
 Cross-ties were used quite early to keep the rails in place, but it was gradually realized that rails would be more efficient if there was an iron point on the top.
 This soon became the common practice, but the iron resulted in more wear on the wooden coach wheels.
 Iron wheels eventually replaced the wooden varieties. In 1767, the first fully iron rails were laid.
 The first form of transport we know is walking. People started to walk upright two million years ago when the Homo Erectus came up (that means upright man).
 Their predecessor, Australopithecus, walked upright less often.
 In fossils of the Australopithecus of 4.2-3.9 million years ago, bipedal specializations are found. The Sahelanthropus may have walked on two legs seven million years ago.
 We can live more environmentally friendly, join an environmental movement or even take action to alleviate future suffering.
 In many cases, it is like treating the symptoms. But if we want more than a temporary solution, we must identify the cause of the problems and eliminate them.
 The scientific and technological development of human society has obviously changed the earth greatly. In addition, overpopulation and extravagant human lifestyle have aggravated the problems.
 After the Declaration of Independence was adopted by the Continental Congress on July 4, a handwritten copy was sent to the printing shop of John Dunlap a few blocks away. This copy was signed by the President of the Continental Congress, John Hancock, and Secretary Charles Thomson.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were made during the night, and are now better known as 'Dunlap broadsides'.
 John Nixon read the document publicly for the first time on July 8 in the garden of Independence Hall.
 One copy was sent to George Washington on July 6 and read to his troops in New York on July 9, and another copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides are the oldest surviving copies of the document. The original handwritten copy did not survive.
 Many paleontologists believe that dinosaurs still exist today. We call them birds.
 Many people don't consider them dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are many things about birds that still remind us of dinosaurs.
 They have claws and scales, lay eggs and walk on their hind legs, just like the Tyrannosaurus Rex.
 Manipulating data encoded in binary digits is the basis for almost all computers in use today.
 A binary number can only have two values, 0 or 1, and these numbers are called binary digits (and in computer science 'bits').
 Internal poisoning may not be immediately obvious. Symptoms such as vomiting are so common that a diagnosis cannot be made immediately.
 The presence of open boxes of medication or toxic household chemicals is the best indication of internal poisoning.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions for that particular poison.
 This insect group is formally called 'true bugs' by entomologists.
 This term comes from an ancient agreement with bedbugs, which are insects that can parasitize humans very well.
 Both red cockroaches and bedbugs are nest-bound, they have adapted to live in the nest or the house of their host.
 In the USA there are about 400,000 known cases of Multiple Sclerosis (MS), making it the most common neurological disease in adults of both younger and middle age.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system. This includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that women are twice as likely to get MS as men.
 A couple may decide that it is not in their best interest, or that of their child, to raise a baby.
 These couples can choose to give up their baby for adoption.
 In an adoption, the parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 Discovering how the world works through the scientific method is the main goal of science. This method is the guideline for most scientific research.
 Yet it is more than just an experiment; an experiment is a test to rule out one or more potential assumptions, to question and to make observations, as a guide for scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers turned to classical texts and especially to the Bible in Latin.
 Aristotle's views on science, including psychology, were accepted.
 The West understood Greek philosophy and science less and less as knowledge of Greek declined.
 In physiological and behavioral observations of rhythms, there is often a strong dependence on endogenous processes and the production via the biological clock.
 Most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals, live according to periodic rhythms. These are not just reactions to external periodic signals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that cycle through a period of time, even if there are no external signals to trigger them.
 The experiment of Hershey and Chase was one of the most important indications that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophages or viruses to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 Two experiments were performed. In one experiment, the DNA in the phage was labelled with a radioactive phosphorus and in the other experiment, the protein of the phage was labelled with radioactive sulphur.
 Mutations can have many different effects, depending on the type, the importance of the genetic material involved, and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Only mutations in germ cells are hereditary. Other mutations can cause cells to die or can cause cancer.
 Nature tourism attracts people who like to visit natural areas because they want to enjoy the landscape, including the flora and fauna.
 On site you can hunt, fish, photograph, observe birds, go to parks and study the ecosystem.
 An example is a visit to, photographing and learning about the orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people from small towns drive to their workplaces and pass people whose workplaces are located in the town they just left.
 Everyone in this dynamic transport shuttle is in some way connected to and supports a private car-based transport system.
 Science has shown that this enormous carbon economy has taken the biosphere out of the stable state that allowed human evolution to occur over the past two million years.
 Everyone participates in society and uses transport systems, and almost everyone complains about it.
 In developed countries, problems with water quality or collapsing bridges are rarely seen.
 Why do so many complaints arise in transport systems, why does it go wrong every day? Are transport technicians just incompetent or is it something more fundamental?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions between the individuals.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to examine the traffic flow, because the behavior of drivers cannot be predicted with 100% certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers behave reasonably predictably. That means that traffic flows show some degree of consistency and that something can be said about this in mathematical terms.
 The three core characteristics have been linked to better represent traffic flow: (1) intensity, (2) density and (3) speed.
 These relationships facilitate the planning, design and operation of road engineering facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to fly. Thanks to their flying ability, they could more easily escape predators and find food and mates more efficiently.
 The advantage of most insects is that they can fold their wings along the body.
 This allows them to hide in a larger number of small places from predators.
 Currently, only dragonflies and mayflies cannot fold their wings.
 A few thousand years ago, Aristarchus said that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 There were people who thought he was right, but many people believed the opposite; that the solar system revolved around the Earth, and the Sun was therefore also (and other stars).
 This sounds pretty logical, because you don't feel the earth moving, right?
 The Amazon River is the world's largest and second-longest river and carries more than 8 times as much water as the second-largest.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on earth and has a width of six miles in some places.
 At least 20% of all water that flows into the sea via the rivers comes from the Amazon.
 The main stem of the Amazon River is 6,387 kilometres (3,980 mi) long. The water comes from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the building of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza remain unsurpassed in size and technical excellence of construction.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom admired the monument of their predecessors, which was already more than a thousand years old.
 There are about 800 inhabitants in Vatican City. This is the smallest independent country in the world and also the country with the lowest population.
 Italian is the official language of the Vatican City.
 Italian is the language most spoken by the people who work there, while Latin is used a lot during religious ceremonies.
 Everyone who lives in Vatican City is Roman Catholic.
 People have known the most basic chemical elements, such as gold, silver and copper, since ancient times, because they are all found in nature and it is fairly easy to extract them with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle speculated that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 This seemed more like what we know of the four states of matter (in the same order): solid, liquid, gas and plasma, but he also theorized that they transition into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are simply a combination of at least metals. As you probably know, the periodic table contains many elements.
 Elements such as calcium and potassium fall under the metals. There are of course also metals such as silver and gold.
 Alloys can also contain a small amount of non-metallic elements, for example carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made up of matter. All matter is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly small that a trillion atoms will fit into the tip of this sentence.
 That's why the pencil was a faithful friend for many people when it was launched.
 The pen has unfortunately been lowered in status as newer writing methods have been introduced and is used much less.
 Nowadays, we write on a computer screen without ever needing a pencil sharpener.
 You may wonder what will happen to the keyboard once something new comes on the market.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that it costs energy to assemble a nucleus with many protons and neutrons.
 As if you were pushing a heavy cart up a hill. When the core is split again, some of the energy is released.
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus, which means that they fall apart at the slightest provocation.
 The surface of the Moon is characterized by dust and rock. The crust is the outer layer of the Moon.
 The crust is about 70 km thick at the closest point and 100 km thick at the farthest point.
 The crust is thinner under the maria and thicker under the highlands.
 There may be more fissures on the side, because the crust is thinner there, and lava could more easily reach the surface.
 Content theories are aimed at finding out what moves people and what appeals to them.
 This theory suggests that people have certain needs and/or desires that are internalized as they grow up.
 With these theories they want to investigate the reasons why certain people want certain things and which environmental factors influence them to do certain things or not.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Hertzberg's Motivation-Hygiene Theory.
 In general, there are two ways in which managers lead their former colleagues. In one, they try to be a peer.
 This type of manager finds it difficult to take unpopular decisions and disciplinary measures, to conduct performance reviews, to delegate and to hold people accountable.
 On the other end of the spectrum, this person transforms into an unrecognizable individual. He or she feels the need to change everything the team has done so far, and wants to take ownership of everything.
 Ultimately, the leader is responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 Often this behavior leads to a gap between the leaders and the team members.
 Virtual teams must meet the same standards of excellence as normal teams, although there are small differences.
 In most cases, virtual team members are the first point of contact for their direct physical group.
 They are often more independent than traditional team members, because their teams can meet across different time zones, which may not be understood by their local management.
 The idea of a truly 'invisible team' (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, pp 109) is a unique element of a virtual team.
 The 'invisible team' is the management team to whom each member reports. The invisible team also sets the standard for each member.
 Why would an organization want to start the time-consuming process of setting up a learning organization? One of the goals for implementing organizational learning concepts is innovation.
 Creativity and resourcefulness are revealed when all available resources are effectively used within the functional departments of an organization.
 The result of this is that the process of an organization that is working together to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new innovative process to meet the needs of the customer.
 To enable innovation in an organization, management must foster a culture in which innovation, shared knowledge, and organizational learning are central.
 According to Angel (2006), organizations can perform better with an approach based on the continuum model.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, which can reduce the scope of the research and collect more accurate data.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior helps scientists during their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, wounds and tumors can affect behavior and lead to changes in mental ability.
 As more and more new technologies are developed, we are learning more and more about the structures and processes in the brain.
 This provides us with a lot of information and material to develop simulation models that give us more insight into the processes of our mind.
 AI conjures up images of science fiction for most people, but it is also an essential part of computer science. It is used in research into machine behaviour, learning and intelligent adaptation.
 Developing machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior is the focus of AI research.
 Some examples are management, planning, the ability to answer customer questions and diagnoses, and recognition of handwriting, voice and face.
 These have become separate disciplines for finding solutions to real-life problems.
 Nowadays, this system of artificial intelligence is widely used in economic, medical, technical and military fields, such as in various software applications for PCs and video games.
 For each class, many excursions are planned. Often a teacher would take her students to places where a bus trip is not an option.
 Thanks to technological developments, virtual excursions are now possible, allowing students to view artefacts in a museum, look inside an aquarium or see beautiful works of art from the classroom.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great way to look back on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, students at Bennet School in North Carolina design a website each year about their trip to the state capital, which is redesigned each year and previous versions are kept online to serve as a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help students to write better. Often their grammar and spelling are poor at first, but this changes quickly because they have an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical audience, the blogger strives to improve the writing and avoid criticism.
 By blogging, students are also forced to learn more about the world around them. The need to keep the audience interested inspires students to be smart and interesting (Toto, 2004).
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to extend learning beyond the traditional school day.
 When used properly, blogs can help students develop analytical and critical thinking skills; by actively engaging in online discussions, students can find their own place in the context of others' material and simultaneously determine their own stance on certain issues (Oravec, 2002).
 The bilingual capital of Canada is the charming Ottawa, full of art galleries and museums that display Canada's past and future.
 Further south you will find the Niagara Falls. In the north you will find the beautiful untouched Muskoka and more.
 This kind of thing makes Ontario typical Canadian in the eyes of outsiders.
 Further north, large areas are sparsely populated and some of these areas are even virtually uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that will surprise many: there are more African Americans in the United States than the total population of Canada.
 The East African islands are located along the east coast of Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and in terms of fauna is almost a separate continent.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent countries or are connected to France and are known as luxurious beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought the Islamic faith with them, which then spread widely on the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India, which marked the beginning of European influence and colonization in the 15th century.
 The region is bordered to the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean and to the north by the Sahel.
 Women: Female travelers are advised to say they are married, whether or not this is true.
 Also, it helps to put rings on (not too expensive looking rings).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences may lead to behaviour that they perceive as intimidating, and that it is common to be followed, to be grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Be clear when you reject a man and do not be afraid to stand up for yourself (cultural differences do not speak well!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded in the 10th century BC by Berber fishermen. The city was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinids and was known as Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed the harbour and rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca. After an earthquake in 1755 they left the city again.
 The Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city and named it Daru l-Bayad. The Spanish traders who settled here gave it the name Casablanca.
 In Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting places to shop.
 Around the old Medina you will find many places where you can buy traditional Moroccan goods, such as tagines, pots, leather products, water pipes and other trinkets, but it is purely aimed at tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of Congo. The city is located near Rwanda, in the far east.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed when the Nyiragongo volcano erupted, burying most of the city's streets, and especially the city center.
 Although Goma itself is relatively safe, you should check the status of the fighting in the province of North Kivu before visiting outside of Goma.
 In addition, the city is the base for the climb of the Nyiragongo volcano and you can find some of the cheapest trips for Mountain Gorilla tracking in Africa.
 With boda-boda (a motorcycle taxi) you can move around Goma. The normal (local) price is about 500 Congolese Francs for the short ride.
 'Timbuktu' is relatively inaccessible and is therefore now used as a metaphor for exotic, far-off countries.
 Today Timbuktu is a dilapidated city, but its reputation makes it a tourist attraction and it has an airport.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of endangered World Heritage Sites because of desert storms.
 It was one of the main stops on the PBS exhibition Special Wonders from the African World by Henry Louis Gates.
 The city differs from the other cities in the country, because it has a more Arabic appearance than an African one.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeast of South Africa and runs in the east along the border with Mozambique, in the north along the border with Zimbabwe and the southern border is the Crocodile River.
 19.500 square kilometers is the park, divided into 14 different eco-zones, where various wild animal species are kept.
 As a major attraction in South Africa, this park is the flagship of the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As with all South African national parks, there are daily conservation levies and entrance fees.
 It can also be useful to buy a Wild Card. These offer either access to certain parts of parks in South Africa or to all national parks in South Africa.
 The entire territory of Hong Kong is named after the island of Hong Kong and is considered by many tourists as the main place.
 The large number of buildings that make up the skyline of Hong Kong has already been compared to a sparkling bar graph that becomes visible thanks to the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best view of Hong Kong, leave the island and head to the waterfront of Kowloon across the harbor.
 The vast majority of the population of Hong Kong Island lives very close together on reclaimed land along the northern coast.
 This is where the British settlers established themselves, so if you are looking for evidence of the colonial past of the area, then you can start here well.
 The Sundarbans are the largest mangrove forests in the world and stretch 80 km (50 miles) from the coast into the Indian and Bangladeshi interior.
 The Sundarbans are now officially included on the UNESCO World Heritage List. The part within the Indian borders is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests are more than just mangrove swamps, however — they also contain some of the last mighty tracts of jungle that ever covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which a third is swamp and marshland.
 The Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary since 1966 and the area is now home to an estimated 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 axis deer.
 During the day, buses leave from the station on the border of the districts (opposite the river). Most leave between 6.30 and 7.30 am, especially in the direction of the east and Jakar / Bumthang.
 It is wise to buy a ticket a few days in advance, because the local buses are often fully booked.
 In most neighborhoods, small Japanese Coaster buses run that are comfortable and robust.
 Shared taxis can take you quickly and comfortably to nearby places, such as Paro (150 ngultrum) and Punakha (200 ngultrum).
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that crosses the Oyapock River to connect the Brazilian city of Oiapoque and the French Guianese city of Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock.
 The two towers have a height of 83 meters. The building has a length of 378 meters and has two passages with a width of 3.50 meters.
 The bridge has a clearance of 15 metres underneath. In August 2011, the construction of the bridge was completed, but it only opened to traffic in March 2017.
 The bridge is scheduled to be fully operational in September 2017, when the Brazilian customs posts are expected to be ready for use.
 The Guaraní were the most prominent indigenous group. They lived in what is now eastern Paraguay, were semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers, and also engaged in subsistence agriculture.
 In the province of Chaco lived other indigenous tribes, including the Guaycurú and Payaguá, who found their food by hunting, fishing and gathering.
 Paraguay, formerly also called 'the great province of India', was founded in the 16th century when Spanish colonists encountered the indigenous population.
 A three-century period of colonization followed under the Spanish.
 Asunción was founded in 1537 and since then Paraguay has managed to retain much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 In December, the biggest tournament of the year takes place on the polo fields in Las Cañitas.
 Here are also smaller tournaments and competitions to be seen at other times of the year.
 Check the Asociación Argentina de Polo for more information about tournaments and buying tickets for polo matches.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound (FKP). The value is approximately one British pound (GBP).
 On the islands there is only one bank, namely in Stanley opposite the shop FIC West. Here you can exchange money.
 In general, British pounds are accepted everywhere on the islands and in Stanley you can also often pay with credit cards and American dollars.
 On the remote islands you probably can't pay with a credit card, but probably with the British and American currency. Ask the owners in advance how you can pay.
 Exchange your money again before you leave the islands, because Falkland currency is very difficult to exchange outside.
 Montevideo is below the equator, so when it is summer there, it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics. In the summer months, temperatures of over 30°C are not uncommon.
 Winter can be deceivingly cold: the temperature almost never goes below zero, but the wind in combination with the humidity makes it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 The rainfall level remains approximately the same throughout the year, without recognizable 'wet' and 'dry' periods.
 Many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, but wild animals are still wild. Therefore, they should not be fed or disturbed.
 Keep at least 100 metres away from bears and wolves, and 25 metres away from all other wild animals.
 Elk, bison, reindeer, bears and most other large animals can attack you, no matter how tame they seem.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured because they do not keep a proper distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous, so give them space.
 In addition, you should be aware that smells attract bears and other wild animals, so avoid wearing or cooking smelly food and keep the campsite clean.
 The capital of Samoa is Apia and the city with almost 40,000 inhabitants is located on the island of Upolu.
 Around the year 1850 Apia was founded and it is the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, seven ships from Germany, the US and Great Britain refused to leave the harbour. This came to be known as the famous standoff.
 With the exception of a British battleship, all ships were sunk. Nearly 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 In the struggle for independence by the Mau movement, the highest leader, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, died in a violent non-violent meeting in the city.
 There are many beaches, especially because of the two ports of Auckland. The most popular are located in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore in the North Harbour district stretch from north to south along the Pacific Ocean, from Long Bay to Devonport.
 These are almost all sandy beaches where it is safe to swim and most have pohutukawa trees that provide shade.
 At Waitemata's harbour, in the luxury suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, located in Central Auckland, you will find the Tamaki Drive beaches.
 These family beaches are sometimes crowded and have a good range of shops on the coast. Swimming is not unsafe.
 'Number One' is the most important local beer that is not a complex beer, but pleasant and refreshing. The other local beer is called 'Manta'.
 There are many French wines to be found, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps better suited for travel.
 The local drinking water can be safely drunk, but bottled water is also easy to find if you don't trust it.
 A 'flat white' is a strange concept for Australians. Black coffee is 'espresso', cappuccino has a lot of milk (without foam) and tea is served without milk.
 The hot chocolate is of Belgian quality. Fruit juices are expensive, but great.
 Trips to the reef occur year-round and injuries from these trips to the reef are rare.
 Ask for expert advice and follow all signs and safety warnings.
 Jellyfish cubes occur from October to April near beaches and river mouths north of Town of 1770. Sometimes they also occur outside this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack people. Most sharks are afraid of people and would rather swim away.
 The main habitat of saltwater crocodiles is in the river mouths north of Rockhampton and they do not normally live in the ocean.
 Reserving in advance provides peace of mind for the traveler, knowing that he has a place to sleep when he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agencies often have deals with certain hotels, although you can usually also book other accommodation forms, such as a camping spot, through a travel agency.
 Travel agencies often offer packages with breakfast and transportation to and from the airport, and sometimes even packages with flight and hotel.
 They can also hold your reservation if you need a little more time to think about the offer or if you need to obtain documents for your destination (e.g. visa).
 However, if you have a request or want to make a change, you must do so through the travel agency rather than the hotel.
 For some festivals, the majority of attendees at music festivals choose to camp on site and most visitors consider this an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you need to be early to get a camping spot near the music.
 And remember this: even if the music on the main stages has finished, there is a chance that music will be played on other parts of the festival grounds until late at night.
 For families with young children, there are special camping areas at some festivals.
 Be careful where your cabin is located if you cross the Baltic Sea in winter, because the ice passage makes a lot of noise if you are too close.
 Cruises to St. Petersburg include time to explore the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (check the conditions).
 Casinos are usually committed to getting the most out of the time and money that guests spend. Windows and clocks are usually not present and the exit is sometimes difficult to find.
 They normally have special offers on food, drink and entertainment to keep them happy and to prevent them from leaving.
 Some locations offer free alcoholic beverages. When people are drunk, however, it affects their judgment and all seasoned gamblers know that it is extremely important to stay sober.
 If you go up into the mountains or over mountain passes, you should take into account that there may be snow or ice and the temperature can be extremely low.
 On icy and snowy roads there is little friction and it therefore drives differently than asphalt.
 During snowstorms, a lot of snow can fall in a very short period of time, which can cause traffic jams.
 Also, visibility can be impaired by falling or blowing snow or by condensation or ice on the vehicle's windows.
 On the other hand, ice and snow are normal in many countries and do not hinder traffic.
 The biggest tourist attraction in Africa are safaris, which for many visitors are the highlight of their trip.
 The term safari in popular usage refers to traveling over land to view the beautiful African wildlife, especially on the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, often come close to cars and a standard equipment makes a good view possible.
 If you want to see lions, cheetahs and leopards, you need a pair of binoculars. Otherwise, you have little chance of seeing them.
 A walking safari (also called a 'forest walk' or 'loopsafari') means that you walk for several hours or days in a row.
 The Paralympics are from 24 August to 5 September 2021. Some events will be held at other venues in Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted the Olympic Games twice, the first time being in 1964.
 If you have already booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced, you may be in a difficult situation.
 Cancellation policies vary, but as of late March, most coronavirus-based cancellation policies are no longer valid until July 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled.
 Ticket prices are expected to range from ¥2,500 to ¥130,000 for most events, with normal tickets costing around ¥7,000.
 You can dry wet clothes by ironing them. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board available. You can often borrow these items, even if they are not in the room.
 If you do not have an iron or do not want to wear ironed socks, you can also use a hairdryer if available.
 Make sure the fabric does not get too hot (this can cause the fabric to shrink or, in extreme cases, burn).
 You can purify water in different ways. Some ways are effective to counter specific risks.
 In some areas it is sufficient to boil water for a minute, in other areas water must be boiled for several minutes.
 Not every filter is equally effective. In case of doubt, it is best to drink water from a sealed bottle from a reliable company.
 Travellers may encounter animal pests that are not found in their own country.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation or, in the worst case, cause allergic reactions, spread poison or transmit infections.
 Normally, infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that injure or kill people with violence, are not considered pests.
 Tax-free shopping means that you can buy goods at certain locations that are exempt from tax and excise duties.
 Travellers going to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot of money on products such as alcohol and tobacco.
 Point Marion and Fairmont are connected by the Buffalo to Pittsburgh highway, you often drive through abandoned backcountry and that makes this route one big challenge.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, keep your head. You will encounter many steep hills, narrow streets and sharp bends.
 The posted speed limits are remarkably lower than in previous and subsequent areas — usually around 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h — and it is even more important to stick to them here than elsewhere.
 Surprisingly, you have much more coverage here than in other corners of the route, such as the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastries taste great and in Bavaria the pastries are quite rich and varied, just like the pastries of the southern neighbor, Austria.
 You see a lot of fruit cakes. All year round the cakes contain apples, and in the summer months also cherries and plums.
 Many popular German pastries contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts, and taste great with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want a few small but mighty pastries, try some that are called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen in the region.
 To make a curry you need spicy and pungent ingredients, in combination with vegetables or meat.
 Depending on the amount of liquid, a curry can be 'dry' or 'wet'.
 In the interior of northern India and also Pakistan, yogurt is often used in curries; in southern India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is often used instead.
 Indonesian cuisine encompasses the foods and culinary practices of the Indonesian archipelago, comprising hundreds of ethnic groups speaking many languages.
 But without additional information, the term refers to the food that originally came from the central and eastern part of the main island of Java.
 The cuisine of Java is now available throughout the archipelago and offers various simple spiced dishes. The most common Javanese flavorings are nuts, peppers, sugar (mainly Javanese coconut sugar) and various fragrant spices.
 Stirrups support the rider's feet and hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They provide the rider with more stability, but can also cause safety problems because the feet of a rider can get stuck in them.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but manages to hang on to the stirrup, they can be dragged along with the horse. To reduce the risk, a number of safety measures have been taken.
 Most riders wear firstly riding boots with a heel and a smooth, fairly narrow sole.
 Some saddles, especially English saddles, have safety bars. These can prevent a stirrup leather from coming off the saddle if the rider falls off the horse.
 Cochamó Valley - This is the most popular climbing destination in Chile, and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with many different large granite walls and boulders.
 The mountain peaks offer a breathtaking view. Climbers from all over the world are constantly discovering new routes on the rock faces that seem to have endless potential.
 Winter sports that involve going downhill, such as skiing and snowboarding, are very popular. You slide down a snow-covered slope on skis or a snowboard.
 Skiing is a popular travel activity with many enthusiasts, who are sometimes called 'ski bums', who plan entire vacations around skiing at a particular location.
 Skiing has been around for a very long time: there are cave paintings of skiers dating back to 5000 BC!
 The beginning of skiing dates back at least to the 17th century and in 1861 the first recreational ski resort in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Backpacking with skis: this activity is also called off-piste skiing, skitouring or ski hiking.
 It's not quite the same, but it's similar to alpine skiing or mountaineering, which is done a lot on steep terrain. You need much sturdier skis and boots for this.
 You can see the ski route as a hiking route.
 In good conditions you can cover greater distances than walking, but it is rare that you reach the speed of cross-country skiing on paved paths without a heavy backpack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries. Normally, travelers between different countries have to apply for multiple visas and undergo passport controls.
 The Schengen area functions in this area almost as one country.
 As long as you are in this zone, you can usually cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 If you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa for each Schengen country separately, which saves time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition that indicates which produced items are antiques. Some tax offices give goods that are older than 100 years the definition antique.
 The definition may vary from location to location. In North America, for example, the age limit is lower than in Europe.
 It is possible to classify handmade products as antiques, even though they are newer than similar mass-produced items.
 For the Sámi, reindeer herding is an important form of livelihood, and the culture surrounding the trade is also important for many with other occupations.
 Even traditionally, however, not all Sámi were involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry. They made a living from fishing, hunting and suchlike, and reindeer were usually used as draught animals.
 Many Sámi work in modern professions today. In Sápmi, the Sámi area, tourism is an important source of income.
 The word 'gypsy' is used mostly by non-Roma, but it is also often considered offensive because of its associations with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about Roma.
 If there is a travel advice for the country you want to travel to, this can have consequences for your travel health insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 In addition to the advice of your own government, you can also consult the advice of other governments. However, their advice is aimed at their own residents.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may face different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 Advice includes only a brief summary of the political situation in a single country.
 They often give a fleeting, general and extremely simplistic picture in comparison with other, more detailed sources.
 Severe weather is the general term for any dangerous weather phenomenon that can cause damage, serious social disruption or loss of life.
 Extreme weather conditions can occur anywhere in the world. There are different types of weather conditions, which vary based on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 The effects of severe weather include strong winds, hail, heavy precipitation, and forest fires, but also thunderstorms, tornadoes, flash floods, and hurricanes.
 Snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms are examples of regional and seasonal extreme weather events.
 Travellers are strongly advised to be aware of the risks that severe weather conditions in their vicinity may bring, as these may also affect some travel plans.
 Anyone who wants to visit a country that is considered a war zone should be professionally trained.
 A search for 'hostile environment training' on the internet is likely to bring up the address of a local company.
 In a course, all the issues that have been outlined here are usually dealt with in more detail, usually in combination with practical experience.
 A course normally lasts 2 to 5 days and consists of role-playing, a lot of first aid and occasionally weapons training.
 There are many books and magazines with articles about survival in the wilderness, but there are few publications about war zones.
 Travellers who have planned a sex change operation abroad should ensure they have the right documentation for their return journey.
 It varies widely whether governments will issue passports without a gender (X) or to correct a name or gender on documents.
 There is as much difference in the willingness of foreign governments to recognize these documents.
 Searches at security checks have also become much more extensive since 11 September 2001.
 Transgender individuals who have not yet undergone surgery can assume that they will not come out of this scan with intact privacy and dignity.
 Mudslides are the recurring flow of waves that break on a reef or something similar and flow onto the beach.
 Due to the underwater topography, the return flow is in some deeper parts, where a rapid flow to deep water can occur.
 Most deaths are caused by exhaustion as people try to swim against the current, which could be impossible.
 When you have escaped from the strong current, swimming back is a piece of cake.
 Try to focus on a place where you won't be caught again. Depending on your skills and whether you have been noticed, you can also wait for help.
 The shock of returning is worse than the culture shock (you have a lesser 'honeymoon feeling'), it lasts longer, and it can be more intense.
 Travellers who are easily adaptable to new cultures sometimes have difficulty in adapting to their own culture.
 If you have lived abroad and then returned, you have adapted to the new culture and have lost some habits from your own culture.
 When you went abroad, you noticed that people were patient and understanding. They understood that travelers had to adapt to a new country.
 Usually, patience and understanding are not expected for travelers returning home.
 For children, the pyramid show with light and sound is one of the most interesting activities in the area.
 You see the pyramids in the dark and you see them in silence before the show begins.
 Often, the sound of vendors and tourists is always audible here. The story of the light and sound is similar to that of a book.
 The Sphinx forms the background and is the narrator of a long story.
 The scenes appear as a projection on the pyramids and the rest of the pyramids are illuminated.
 The South Shetland Islands were discovered in 1819 and have since been claimed by several countries. They have the most bases, with sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 km north of the peninsula. The largest island is King George Island with the settlement Villa Las Estrellas.
 Others are Livingston Island, and Deception. Here you will find the crater of an active volcano that serves as a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth is located on the southern side of the peninsula, near the border with the Bellingshausen Sea.
 Here the mountains of the peninsula give way to the plateau, after which they reappear to form the 360 km long mountain range Mount Ellsworth, which is crossed by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, also known as the Sentinel Range, includes the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif. Mount Vinson is the highest mountain at 4,892 meters.
 A satellite phone may be your only option in remote locations where there is no mobile phone reception.
 A satellite phone is not really a replacement for a mobile phone, since you have to be outside with a clear view of the satellite to make a phone call.
 This service is often used by the shipping industry, including pleasure craft, and for expeditions where there is a need for external data and communication.
 Your local telephone provider can give you more information about how to connect to this service.
 It is becoming increasingly popular for people planning a gap year to travel and learn.
 Especially school leavers make use of this to take a gap year before university without negative consequences for their education.
 Often, an enrolment in a course abroad during a gap year can increase your chances of continuing your education in your own country.
 Normally, there is a fee for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is a fantastic destination for boating. The 'Land of a thousand lakes' also has thousands of islands, in the lakes and in the archipelagos off the coast.
 A hunt is not necessary for the archipels or lakes.
 The archipels off the coast and the largest lakes are indeed big enough for any yacht, but with smaller boats or even a kayak you get a completely different experience.
 In Finland, so many people sail in their spare time that the ratio of boats to people is one to seven or eight.
 The figure is equal to the figure of Norway, Sweden and New Zealand. Furthermore, it is quite unique (in the Netherlands, for example, the figure is one in forty).
 Most Baltic cruises include a long stay in St. Petersburg (Russia).
 This way you can spend a few full days in the historic town and spend the night on the ship.
 Since 2009, you do not need a separate visa if you only go ashore during a boat excursion.
 Some cruises include a visit to the German capital Berlin, but as you can see on the map, Berlin is not close to the sea. A visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying can be scary for people of all backgrounds and ages, especially if they have never flown before or have had a traumatic experience.
 It is not something to be ashamed of: it is no different than many fears that other people have.
 If you know how airplanes work, this can help to remove a fear that comes from the unknown or from the fact that you have no control over the plane.
 Courier companies are paid a generous fee to deliver items quickly. For business documents, purchases or spare parts for a necessary repair, time often plays a very important role.
 Larger companies could use their own planes for certain routes, but for other routes and smaller companies it became more difficult.
 If they ship things by air, it can take days for them to be unloaded and cleared by customs on some routes.
 Only checked baggage could be processed faster. According to the rules of airlines, there must be a corresponding passenger and that is you.
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay for the privilege (or better yet, have your employer pay for it).
 However, this is not cheap: the rule of thumb is that you pay about four times economy class for business, and about eleven times for first class.
 It is usually not worth looking for discounts for business class or first class tickets on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know very well that there is a group of flyers who are willing to pay a lot of money to fly somewhere quickly and comfortably and the airlines charge accordingly.
 Chişinău is the capital of Moldova. Here the Romanian language is spoken, but also the Russian language is spoken a lot.
 As a multi-ethnic republic, Moldova was plagued by an ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed republic of Transnistria in eastern Moldova. This republic has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by the members of the UN.
 Economic ties have been re-established between these two parts of Moldova, despite the failure of political negotiations.
 Orthodox Christianity is the main religion in Moldova.
 İzmir is the third largest city in Turkey with about 3.7 million inhabitants, the largest port after Istanbul and a good traffic hub.
 The once ancient city of Izmir is now a modern, developed and busy commercial center on a bay and is surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, the glass buildings and the modern shopping centers covered with red tiles, the 18th-century markets, the old mosques and churches, but yet the city feels more like a Mediterranean, European city than traditionally Turkish.
 In the village of Haldarsvík you can enjoy views of the nearby island of Eysturoy, as well as a special church with eight corners.
 On a number of graves near the church are interesting marble sculptures of doves.
 If you have half an hour, you should definitely take a look around this village.
 In the north you will find the easily accessible, romantic and fascinating place Sintra. Sintra became famous among foreigners after Lord Byron spoke highly of the beautiful monuments there.
 Scotturb bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 Also go to the north and see the beautiful Sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima (a temple complex), where internationally known Marian apparitions took place.
 Remember that you are actually just visiting a mass grave, but also a place that has a meaning for a large part of the world population.
 Many men and women who survived their time here are still alive, and many of them have loved ones who were murdered or worked themselves to death there, both Jews and non-Jews.
 Show all appropriate respect, solemnity and dignity during your visit. Do not trivialise the Holocaust or Nazism.
 Do not damage the site by marking or graffiti on the buildings.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the inhabitants prefer Catalan, the vast majority can understand it, and almost everyone speaks Spanish.
 However, most signs are in Catalan, as that is the first official language according to the law.
 In public transport and other facilities Spanish is spoken frequently.
 Ordinary announcements in the metro are only in Catalan, but unscheduled interruptions are done by an automated system in several languages, including French, Arabic, Spanish, English and also in Japanese.
 The inhabitants of Paris are known as selfish, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is usually just an incorrect stereotype, it can't hurt to put your best foot forward in Paris and act like someone who is 'bien élevé' (well-mannered). This will make it a lot easier to explore Paris.
 The hard exterior of the Parisians disappears quickly when you show that you are familiar with their way of doing things.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested and this forested area consists mainly of beech, spruce and pine, and includes a combination of alpine and Mediterranean flora.
 There are a lot of different plant communities, because of the different microclimates, the different types of soil and the varying altitude differences.
 This area is also the habitat of a very wide range of animal and bird species.
 There are rare animals such as the European brown bear, the wolf, the eagle, the owl, the lynx, the wild cat and the capercaillie, as well as many more common species.
 When women visit a monastery, they are required to wear a skirt to the knee and their shoulders must be covered.
 Usually you get a sash as a woman if you arrive unprepared at a monastery, but if you bring your own example, with nice screaming colors, the monk or nun who stands at the entrance will smile at you.
 On the other hand, men must wear trousers to at least above the knee.
 You can also borrow these from the stock at the entrance, but this clothing is not washed after each use, so you may not feel comfortable in it. One size fits all for men!
 Like many other Mediterranean regions, the Mallorcan cuisine is based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork) and uses a lot of olive oil.
 A simple and popular dish for dinner, especially during the summer months, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomatoes and whatever is available to flavor it, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 Nouns, like Sie what you mean, always have a capital letter at the beginning, even if they are in the middle of the sentence.
 In this way you make a clear distinction between a number of verbs and objects.
 It probably also makes reading easier. However, writing is more complicated, because you have to figure out whether a verb or adjective should be used as a noun.
 Most Italian words are written exactly as they are pronounced, so pronunciation is generally not a problem.
 You have to pay most attention to the c and the g. The pronunciation of these letters depends on the vowel that follows.
 Also, you have to pronounce the r and rr differently: caro means sweetheart, while carro means car.
 Persian has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 Reading this introduction to the grammar will teach you a lot about the grammar of Persian and help you to understand sentences.
 It is quite logical that if you know a Romance language, it is easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 But people who speak a little Spanish can quickly conclude that Portuguese is so similar that you don't have to learn it separately.
 Premodern observatories are now obsolete, and serve as museums or educational attractions.
 Light pollution was not as big a problem back then as it is now, so they were often built in cities or on campuses, more accessible than those of today.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge facilities built in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami is the viewing of cherry blossoms and has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 In China, plum blossoms were the favorite flowers and that's where the concept came from.
 The first cherry blossom festivals in Japan were organized by the emperor and were intended only for himself and other aristocrats at the imperial court.
 Plants look best in a natural environment, which means you have to suppress the urge to remove even 'just one' species.
 When you collect samples during a visit to a landscaped garden, you are immediately and without discussion denied access to the garden.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to stay, very easy to navigate and almost everything is available after arrival.
 But if you are in the 'high tropics', but a few degrees north of the equator, you experience both heat (always) and powerful sun (when the sky is clear, this happens less often).
 There are also some buses going north to Hebron, the burial place of the biblical patriarchs Isaac, Jacob, Abraham and their wives.
 Make sure that the bus you take really goes to Hebron and not only to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good holiday destination.
 For example, you can visit castles in the Loire Valley or the Rhine Valley, book a cruise to the interesting cities along the Danube or take a boat trip along the Erie Canal.
 They also provide popular walking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of Christianity, celebrating the birth of Jesus.
 People who do not believe in Christian countries and non-Christians around the world have also adopted many traditions associated with the holiday.
 There is a tradition of staying up all night on Easter Eve until you can see the sunrise.
 Of course, there are Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it could just as well be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 In traditional churches, a Easter Vigil is often held on the Saturday evening of the Easter weekend, with congregations often celebrating a midnight feast in honor of the resurrection of Christ.
 All animals that originally arrived at the islands came here by swimming, flying or drifting.
 Due to the long distance from the mainland, it was not possible for mammals to make the journey, so the giant tortoise became the most common grazing mammal on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since humans set foot on the Galapagos, all kinds of mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats and dogs.
 During the winter, the Arctic and Antarctic regions experience polar night, which means that the sun does not actually rise.
 There is a good chance you will be able to see the aurora borealis, as the sky will be dark most of the time.
 The areas are sparsely populated and therefore light pollution is not often a problem. That means you can also enjoy the starry sky.
 The Japanese work environment is more structured and formal than in the Western world.
 Work clothes are standard and colleagues call each other by their last name or job title.
 Unity in the workplace is crucial. The focus is on group performance rather than on rewarding individual work performance.
 Employees often need permission from their supervisors before they can make a decision and are expected to follow the instructions of their supervisors without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.32900686917312594, 'precisions': [0.6456569709127382, 0.39045707355831555, 0.2609929697393127, 0.17808031431312532], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.008252093361919, 'translation_length': 24925, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 60.62036573933004, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8747192163594627, 'scores': [0.8184178471565247, 0.8398627638816833, 0.9254282712936401, 0.8223498463630676, 0.9048062562942505, 0.8214296698570251, 0.87274569272995, 0.8841521143913269, 0.8037970662117004, 0.9435217380523682, 0.9114170074462891, 0.892693817615509, 0.9023167490959167, 0.8609341382980347, 0.862981379032135, 0.8738771080970764, 0.8827735185623169, 0.9265719652175903, 0.9240902066230774, 0.8778980374336243, 0.9306195378303528, 0.95526522397995, 0.9193646311759949, 0.8783544898033142, 0.872545599937439, 0.9226687550544739, 0.811684787273407, 0.8676871657371521, 0.8781006932258606, 0.9433979988098145, 0.8506482243537903, 0.8305076956748962, 0.8092672824859619, 0.89524245262146, 0.9088932871818542, 0.9246494770050049, 0.8684863448143005, 0.902090311050415, 0.8804721832275391, 0.9276189804077148, 0.8416885733604431, 0.9083907008171082, 0.9121682047843933, 0.9269171357154846, 0.8749640583992004, 0.8512511849403381, 0.9046181440353394, 0.9122668504714966, 0.9256706833839417, 0.9140652418136597, 0.9406370520591736, 0.922558069229126, 0.8990994691848755, 0.9093487858772278, 0.8862956762313843, 0.8624812364578247, 0.84200519323349, 0.8775936961174011, 0.9274840950965881, 0.9084785580635071, 0.8628001809120178, 0.9077338576316833, 0.8437865972518921, 0.9220260381698608, 0.8725237250328064, 0.9019291996955872, 0.876272439956665, 0.8767130970954895, 0.9188927412033081, 0.8704288005828857, 0.8365129828453064, 0.8789689540863037, 0.872254490852356, 0.8434991240501404, 0.839475691318512, 0.8746544718742371, 0.8837891817092896, 0.8753038644790649, 0.9200171828269958, 0.9088613390922546, 0.9352522492408752, 0.9023489952087402, 0.8869175314903259, 0.7885873317718506, 0.8427990078926086, 0.9098994135856628, 0.8612669110298157, 0.8876630663871765, 0.9008864760398865, 0.8648931384086609, 0.8627758622169495, 0.9028864502906799, 0.8454152345657349, 0.8902927041053772, 0.9222614765167236, 0.9270637631416321, 0.8948067426681519, 0.9050927758216858, 0.9265006184577942, 0.8672328591346741, 0.9155575037002563, 0.8756402730941772, 0.9174312353134155, 0.9233366250991821, 0.9139869809150696, 0.916321873664856, 0.900669276714325, 0.8382617235183716, 0.8442901372909546, 0.841966450214386, 0.896270751953125, 0.9339449405670166, 0.9468883872032166, 0.9106543660163879, 0.8267684578895569, 0.848676860332489, 0.8955658078193665, 0.9028855562210083, 0.9639609456062317, 0.8318292498588562, 0.8716409206390381, 0.8742048144340515, 0.8992353081703186, 0.9122220277786255, 0.9211305975914001, 0.9114276170730591, 0.9107559323310852, 0.901989758014679, 0.9010558724403381, 0.8871030807495117, 0.9077282547950745, 0.8598037362098694, 0.9117893576622009, 0.8966522812843323, 0.791824996471405, 0.7822051644325256, 0.6787075996398926, 0.9147436618804932, 0.9598771929740906, 0.8438287973403931, 0.9122437834739685, 0.8735933899879456, 0.9140202403068542, 0.864109456539154, 0.885395348072052, 0.8693360686302185, 0.8871625661849976, 0.9244539141654968, 0.8489403128623962, 0.9126224517822266, 0.9032360911369324, 0.8934000134468079, 0.8383712768554688, 0.8614587187767029, 0.8014674782752991, 0.8694078326225281, 0.7900711894035339, 0.8279567956924438, 0.8726083636283875, 0.889937698841095, 0.9063425660133362, 0.852078378200531, 0.8666070103645325, 0.8798972368240356, 0.8605626225471497, 0.8598544001579285, 0.8870958089828491, 0.8545914888381958, 0.8696034550666809, 0.8873185515403748, 0.8899420499801636, 0.838537871837616, 0.9326551556587219, 0.8851848244667053, 0.8614521026611328, 0.7782402634620667, 0.7723903059959412, 0.935623824596405, 0.8274086713790894, 0.9519209861755371, 0.9210464954376221, 0.8927584886550903, 0.9148864150047302, 0.9161502122879028, 0.8997349739074707, 0.8759099841117859, 0.9681949019432068, 0.8759533762931824, 0.8406813144683838, 0.8503300547599792, 0.9162747263908386, 0.9147744178771973, 0.8697333931922913, 0.8713387846946716, 0.9111307263374329, 0.9255902171134949, 0.85492342710495, 0.8316948413848877, 0.8748335242271423, 0.8327211737632751, 0.8573422431945801, 0.8712384104728699, 0.8514195680618286, 0.8110700249671936, 0.8890473246574402, 0.8770654201507568, 0.8479094505310059, 0.8302916884422302, 0.9253794550895691, 0.9206644296646118, 0.8573071956634521, 0.9160228371620178, 0.9219985008239746, 0.9099872708320618, 0.9191445708274841, 0.7872433662414551, 0.936699390411377, 0.8711420297622681, 0.8939079642295837, 0.9010031819343567, 0.9589681625366211, 0.9096565246582031, 0.9092829823493958, 0.8585485816001892, 0.9340828061103821, 0.8962883949279785, 0.9285845160484314, 0.8691115975379944, 0.9038764238357544, 0.8023995757102966, 0.8865329623222351, 0.8827542662620544, 0.8310481905937195, 0.8583409190177917, 0.8689131140708923, 0.8933354616165161, 0.8726762533187866, 0.8655514121055603, 0.9484243988990784, 0.8903844356536865, 0.8660670518875122, 0.8213325142860413, 0.849218487739563, 0.9285146594047546, 0.82072514295578, 0.917422890663147, 0.8598325252532959, 0.833089292049408, 0.8192901015281677, 0.923739492893219, 0.8659549951553345, 0.9125716686248779, 0.8719367384910583, 0.9169912934303284, 0.9254335761070251, 0.9090602993965149, 0.9260386228561401, 0.9276984333992004, 0.871366560459137, 0.8990693092346191, 0.9035560488700867, 0.8471448421478271, 0.655072033405304, 0.8331887722015381, 0.9019516110420227, 0.8912988305091858, 0.8742803931236267, 0.8620206713676453, 0.9445571303367615, 0.9206860065460205, 0.8628562688827515, 0.8594171404838562, 0.8581625819206238, 0.8006534576416016, 0.8814957737922668, 0.8078488111495972, 0.838307797908783, 0.9368683099746704, 0.841892659664154, 0.9268153309822083, 0.8836818337440491, 0.8782695531845093, 0.9111351370811462, 0.9112663865089417, 0.9088123440742493, 0.9377387166023254, 0.9022703170776367, 0.805523157119751, 0.9187545776367188, 0.9034488797187805, 0.8853619694709778, 0.7779594659805298, 0.8932949900627136, 0.8990636467933655, 0.8355066180229187, 0.9220256209373474, 0.8815514445304871, 0.8536375164985657, 0.6382796168327332, 0.8512980341911316, 0.898366391658783, 0.8829959034919739, 0.90147864818573, 0.9127693176269531, 0.9167081713676453, 0.8428592681884766, 0.8442972302436829, 0.8174866437911987, 0.8865346312522888, 0.9051488041877747, 0.8969473838806152, 0.909861147403717, 0.895952045917511, 0.7061572074890137, 0.9282671809196472, 0.8623038530349731, 0.8686714768409729, 0.8591001629829407, 0.9022814631462097, 0.9034309983253479, 0.8655272126197815, 0.8818162083625793, 0.9151080250740051, 0.8665100932121277, 0.9108130931854248, 0.8475040197372437, 0.8430295586585999, 0.8783790469169617, 0.9299222826957703, 0.9333992600440979, 0.9093491435050964, 0.8647984862327576, 0.9320130944252014, 0.9115695953369141, 0.9543942809104919, 0.8752875924110413, 0.904514729976654, 0.8469654321670532, 0.889436662197113, 0.9077755808830261, 0.7548858523368835, 0.9211714863777161, 0.8491863012313843, 0.8856956362724304, 0.9296875596046448, 0.8475719690322876, 0.8941003680229187, 0.8874297142028809, 0.7870521545410156, 0.8837204575538635, 0.8838700652122498, 0.8278037309646606, 0.8879116773605347, 0.969049334526062, 0.8341191411018372, 0.9078885912895203, 0.8752550482749939, 0.8965542912483215, 0.8451613187789917, 0.7911221385002136, 0.8220798373222351, 0.883639395236969, 0.9337409138679504, 0.8093138337135315, 0.9287391304969788, 0.8485761284828186, 0.8541768789291382, 0.9022732973098755, 0.7167888879776001, 0.8531522750854492, 0.830039918422699, 0.8411388993263245, 0.8774495720863342, 0.8025410771369934, 0.9124440550804138, 0.9294931888580322, 0.9255996942520142, 0.944163978099823, 0.8479121327400208, 0.9029919505119324, 0.9137974381446838, 0.8027711510658264, 0.7844690680503845, 0.6841759085655212, 0.7089222073554993, 0.8999578356742859, 0.793806791305542, 0.8815901875495911, 0.8873804211616516, 0.8762328624725342, 0.9016717076301575, 0.8878406882286072, 0.8247800469398499, 0.9555739760398865, 0.8988862633705139, 0.8800367116928101, 0.8372208476066589, 0.9598693251609802, 0.7937377691268921, 0.9126697182655334, 0.9160327315330505, 0.8764576315879822, 0.8704082369804382, 0.863544762134552, 0.8563682436943054, 0.8721358180046082, 0.8797591328620911, 0.8381546139717102, 0.9072939157485962, 0.8861684799194336, 0.8965856432914734, 0.842058002948761, 0.8738837838172913, 0.8951511383056641, 0.8858196139335632, 0.863092303276062, 0.8655137419700623, 0.8824850916862488, 0.9050456285476685, 0.9517730474472046, 0.9344626665115356, 0.9059402346611023, 0.8710162043571472, 0.8414343595504761, 0.8537776470184326, 0.8843886256217957, 0.9057632684707642, 0.879045844078064, 0.9148632884025574, 0.9211980104446411, 0.8737625479698181, 0.752921998500824, 0.8102469444274902, 0.8594250082969666, 0.8818220496177673, 0.7851099967956543, 0.8900212645530701, 0.8993416428565979, 0.8942062258720398, 0.9026878476142883, 0.8577472567558289, 0.8882327079772949, 0.8815279603004456, 0.8398836851119995, 0.8393978476524353, 0.8668505549430847, 0.8944605588912964, 0.8349406719207764, 0.9076032638549805, 0.8312415480613708, 0.9230760335922241, 0.8753292560577393, 0.908795177936554, 0.875133216381073, 0.8631384372711182, 0.8479449152946472, 0.791119396686554, 0.8665558099746704, 0.8335776925086975, 0.8631733059883118, 0.9049819111824036, 0.8854082226753235, 0.8672537207603455, 0.9054951667785645, 0.8853007555007935, 0.8691012263298035, 0.9061324000358582, 0.812444269657135, 0.8246129751205444, 0.8398663997650146, 0.8075776696205139, 0.765179455280304, 0.8164561986923218, 0.833833634853363, 0.8529843091964722, 0.8952047228813171, 0.8279649019241333, 0.7856733202934265, 0.9126140475273132, 0.9219470620155334, 0.8806939125061035, 0.8725674748420715, 0.9181703329086304, 0.8492884635925293, 0.8980893492698669, 0.8495245575904846, 0.8865934610366821, 0.8317500352859497, 0.8387206196784973, 0.8735702633857727, 0.8587741255760193, 0.834536075592041, 0.8886047601699829, 0.8857792019844055, 0.8819237351417542, 0.8639161586761475, 0.8367686867713928, 0.9063438177108765, 0.9189982414245605, 0.9341393113136292, 0.9393954277038574, 0.9205209612846375, 0.8591170907020569, 0.8871771097183228, 0.8192216157913208, 0.8239354491233826, 0.8802464604377747, 0.8503981828689575, 0.8620581030845642, 0.8791936039924622, 0.7598270177841187, 0.7475547194480896, 0.8558646440505981, 0.8151188492774963, 0.9296479821205139, 0.946567714214325, 0.8157838582992554, 0.9136729836463928, 0.8249747157096863, 0.9326682090759277, 0.9060819745063782, 0.8690775036811829, 0.7699025869369507, 0.8817229270935059, 0.9025073647499084, 0.9013953804969788, 0.8863926529884338, 0.7811905741691589, 0.844124972820282, 0.8478485941886902, 0.8635287880897522, 0.8862782120704651, 0.8658770322799683, 0.8588353395462036, 0.8822396397590637, 0.8066104054450989, 0.7933871150016785, 0.8207706809043884, 0.8763538002967834, 0.8327857255935669, 0.8858330249786377, 0.8492711186408997, 0.8956805467605591, 0.8630415797233582, 0.8931654691696167, 0.8491021990776062, 0.8437565565109253, 0.8351689577102661, 0.8611895442008972, 0.8927069902420044, 0.8326224684715271, 0.8737652897834778, 0.880245566368103, 0.8583266139030457, 0.9072529077529907, 0.7929319143295288, 0.7173054218292236, 0.8215107321739197, 0.7932902574539185, 0.8684169054031372, 0.8623960614204407, 0.8855780959129333, 0.8756551146507263, 0.8737314343452454, 0.8709069490432739, 0.871271550655365, 0.8811582922935486, 0.8344380855560303, 0.8244430422782898, 0.8636019825935364, 0.9105769991874695, 0.9223551750183105, 0.8640500903129578, 0.8633413910865784, 0.9396730065345764, 0.8876559138298035, 0.8562518358230591, 0.87972092628479, 0.9043153524398804, 0.9208868145942688, 0.8862665295600891, 0.9593563675880432, 0.751743495464325, 0.8444569706916809, 0.8072646260261536, 0.8979013562202454, 0.8953154683113098, 0.9282216429710388, 0.9409335851669312, 0.8785764575004578, 0.9133816361427307, 0.9240184426307678, 0.8173154592514038, 0.9064071774482727, 0.9124007225036621, 0.807245671749115, 0.8595845103263855, 0.8817203044891357, 0.8574903607368469, 0.919260561466217, 0.8998799920082092, 0.8334479331970215, 0.8956449627876282, 0.8643355965614319, 0.8677502870559692, 0.846255362033844, 0.8343061804771423, 0.8294506669044495, 0.8636594414710999, 0.8651903867721558, 0.9044758081436157, 0.8787440657615662, 0.8744483590126038, 0.8802123665809631, 0.8888148069381714, 0.8823864459991455, 0.900390625, 0.9322922825813293, 0.9091107845306396, 0.8723065257072449, 0.8733655214309692, 0.7459779381752014, 0.8867222666740417, 0.8231452107429504, 0.8564822673797607, 0.8876368403434753, 0.922018826007843, 0.904823362827301, 0.9076706767082214, 0.8972548246383667, 0.8525397181510925, 0.9057632088661194, 0.8127084374427795, 0.9119853377342224, 0.9412720203399658, 0.9129651188850403, 0.918357789516449, 0.9048592448234558, 0.851878821849823, 0.9011749625205994, 0.9019080996513367, 0.9467716813087463, 0.843173623085022, 0.8560600876808167, 0.8259295225143433, 0.831343412399292, 0.8493677973747253, 0.8927498459815979, 0.8425742983818054, 0.8778499364852905, 0.917401134967804, 0.8762646913528442, 0.8225131630897522, 0.7873601317405701, 0.9073188900947571, 0.9238767027854919, 0.8468887209892273, 0.8740608096122742, 0.6745448708534241, 0.866954505443573, 0.8868873715400696, 0.9245639443397522, 0.8815246224403381, 0.920726478099823, 0.9077842235565186, 0.8883468508720398, 0.8972532153129578, 0.9272927641868591, 0.921360194683075, 0.8963417410850525, 0.8949334025382996, 0.8929916024208069, 0.8572452664375305, 0.8825007081031799, 0.9348961114883423, 0.8975146412849426, 0.8296498656272888, 0.9111976027488708, 0.8811529278755188, 0.9292576909065247, 0.8934670090675354, 0.9327266216278076, 0.8759411573410034, 0.8432680368423462, 0.8440902233123779, 0.9198506474494934, 0.9124774932861328, 0.8560945391654968, 0.9012938141822815, 0.901934802532196, 0.9496846795082092, 0.8742300271987915, 0.8909019827842712, 0.8677787184715271, 0.7879425883293152, 0.9360536932945251, 0.8942660689353943, 0.9268409013748169, 0.8354753851890564, 0.932895839214325, 0.8402964472770691, 0.9156957268714905, 0.9158909916877747, 0.836383044719696, 0.7572138905525208, 0.8494116067886353, 0.797400712966919, 0.9138814806938171, 0.8556045293807983, 0.9034390449523926, 0.9272715449333191, 0.8490263819694519, 0.914040744304657, 0.8747344613075256, 0.863583505153656, 0.8694406747817993, 0.916341245174408, 0.8757488131523132, 0.9058672189712524, 0.8544414639472961, 0.8722583651542664, 0.8834712505340576, 0.8819239735603333, 0.8459485173225403, 0.9068379998207092, 0.9174842834472656, 0.8913804292678833, 0.8485859036445618, 0.8199717402458191, 0.9140787720680237, 0.7920278906822205, 0.8541209697723389, 0.9023446440696716, 0.8758975267410278, 0.9150041937828064, 0.9060033559799194, 0.8779401779174805, 0.8491371273994446, 0.8925480246543884, 0.8633706569671631, 0.8024132251739502, 0.8678041100502014, 0.8593980073928833, 0.8687134385108948, 0.9072014689445496, 0.906539261341095, 0.8945296406745911, 0.8304241299629211, 0.7801586985588074, 0.9233283400535583, 0.9569490551948547, 0.925346314907074, 0.8525261282920837, 0.9087441563606262, 0.8870324492454529, 0.8577137589454651, 0.8755070567131042, 0.8226600289344788, 0.8687676191329956, 0.8941590189933777, 0.9293243288993835, 0.931119978427887, 0.8807966113090515, 0.8926834464073181, 0.8532246351242065, 0.8832041621208191, 0.9263318181037903, 0.8961386680603027, 0.8854290246963501, 0.9318156838417053, 0.8400366902351379, 0.9058555960655212, 0.8091035485267639, 0.8861939311027527, 0.8957126140594482, 0.9171459078788757, 0.8254567980766296, 0.8828921914100647, 0.9217382073402405, 0.897851824760437, 0.8610816597938538, 0.8590770959854126, 0.9069072604179382, 0.8615655899047852, 0.8479837775230408, 0.7973014712333679, 0.9233166575431824, 0.8997464776039124, 0.9018704295158386, 0.9152267575263977, 0.8858272433280945, 0.884389340877533, 0.8384231328964233, 0.9066037535667419, 0.9130999445915222, 0.8633392453193665, 0.9413653016090393, 0.7746314406394958, 0.9228264093399048, 0.8629174828529358, 0.8636573553085327, 0.8791081309318542, 0.8314375281333923, 0.8148667216300964, 0.8256182074546814, 0.9231784343719482, 0.8228933811187744, 0.9122246503829956, 0.9136552214622498, 0.8925729990005493, 0.7873116135597229, 0.8503448367118835, 0.9148273468017578, 0.9081186056137085, 0.9226145148277283, 0.9062096476554871, 0.9034923911094666, 0.8800179362297058, 0.8689435124397278, 0.888153076171875, 0.8898493647575378, 0.8802448511123657, 0.8229263424873352, 0.8657326102256775, 0.941074550151825, 0.913480818271637, 0.8811275362968445, 0.885265052318573, 0.8122710585594177, 0.8460339903831482, 0.8813158869743347, 0.7937437891960144, 0.8818619847297668, 0.7876671552658081, 0.8883510231971741, 0.8722992539405823, 0.8100302815437317, 0.9270336031913757, 0.8812281489372253, 0.7869394421577454, 0.8723517060279846, 0.8644929528236389, 0.8552404642105103, 0.8882237076759338, 0.8173455595970154, 0.8766551613807678, 0.8128613829612732, 0.894899845123291, 0.8342291712760925, 0.8736880421638489, 0.9280357956886292, 0.8994473814964294, 0.902582049369812, 0.9058371186256409, 0.8394013047218323, 0.7955419421195984, 0.8608664870262146, 0.8869002461433411, 0.832146167755127, 0.9355421662330627, 0.8876796364784241, 0.891426146030426, 0.9043472409248352, 0.9028540849685669, 0.8833826780319214, 0.8586340546607971, 0.8970350623130798, 0.8839297294616699, 0.8270584940910339, 0.8694270253181458, 0.9418410062789917, 0.8831608295440674, 0.8480384945869446, 0.9292542338371277, 0.9163911938667297, 0.9037287831306458, 0.9141786694526672, 0.8811870813369751, 0.9362818598747253, 0.863365113735199, 0.8670501708984375, 0.9146764278411865, 0.907267153263092, 0.8694406151771545, 0.7788416147232056, 0.8218838572502136, 0.8374829888343811, 0.8014113306999207, 0.8001686930656433, 0.8574721813201904, 0.8891677260398865, 0.7949075102806091, 0.8138222694396973, 0.8329457640647888, 0.857081413269043, 0.874413251876831, 0.87126624584198, 0.8425905108451843, 0.9145642518997192, 0.9065137505531311, 0.8560279011726379, 0.9075034856796265, 0.8025332689285278, 0.9090712666511536, 0.9283187985420227, 0.840410053730011, 0.8706634640693665, 0.8397958278656006, 0.8817827105522156, 0.9288591146469116, 0.9104965329170227, 0.8556872010231018, 0.9460433125495911, 0.9039650559425354, 0.8451928496360779, 0.8749061226844788, 0.916379451751709, 0.8968504667282104, 0.6207647919654846, 0.8917373418807983, 0.7485498785972595, 0.8648244738578796, 0.8877988457679749, 0.8401363492012024, 0.8831046223640442, 0.8852502703666687, 0.9045113921165466, 0.8800790905952454, 0.8590870499610901, 0.8511443734169006, 0.8763098120689392, 0.8880454301834106, 0.7338957190513611, 0.8741294145584106, 0.8695511221885681, 0.8630450963973999, 0.8776569962501526, 0.8856122493743896, 0.8740359544754028, 0.9069966673851013, 0.9399703145027161, 0.9571666121482849, 0.9315527081489563, 0.8706103563308716, 0.8435533046722412, 0.8175773024559021, 0.8642283082008362, 0.7906734347343445, 0.8344957232475281, 0.9329947829246521, 0.8647814393043518, 0.8187636733055115, 0.89718097448349, 0.8729220032691956, 0.8781685829162598, 0.9261191487312317, 0.8940951824188232, 0.8942966461181641, 0.8656250834465027, 0.9003495573997498, 0.8172939419746399, 0.7555690407752991, 0.8934758305549622, 0.8809725046157837, 0.9371174573898315, 0.8613726496696472, 0.8782998919487, 0.6836206316947937, 0.7695084810256958, 0.8297681212425232, 0.9015045762062073, 0.8796156048774719, 0.7222297787666321, 0.8545070290565491, 0.8648523688316345, 0.8950238823890686, 0.8090493083000183, 0.860535204410553, 0.9630598425865173, 0.8257555961608887, 0.8387030363082886, 0.8620160818099976, 0.9282336831092834, 0.8531829714775085, 0.9516507983207703, 0.8838267922401428, 0.9119716286659241, 0.8936576247215271, 0.8405556678771973, 0.7417282462120056, 0.9118041396141052, 0.8454074859619141, 0.9213154911994934, 0.9045360684394836, 0.8915750980377197, 0.9084547162055969, 0.9081079959869385, 0.9313278198242188, 0.865482747554779, 0.8243382573127747, 0.9166603684425354, 0.8566957116127014, 0.9233410954475403, 0.8546847701072693, 0.9139915704727173, 0.8663326501846313, 0.8228873610496521, 0.9055261611938477, 0.888420820236206, 0.8741112351417542, 0.8732334971427917, 0.8820657134056091]}